[Daily Discussion] Saturday, April 21, 2018 -- TITLE
#New post: [\[Daily Discussion\] Sunday, April 22, 2018 →](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8e0z4r/daily_discussion_sunday_april_22_2018/)
I really think it's too early to retest 9k now. Rsi is too hot on longer timeframes, we need to cool off, range a bit etc. But what looked like a heavy bearish impulse to me doesn't seem to follow suit, good. Panic times are def over. The market will be neutral/bullish for some time I think. Would like to see a correction to 8.2-8.4 and some consolidation. Chilling for now :)
I scaled into a long position all the way from 6.8k to 8.2k (https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8bnetl/daily_discussion_thursday_april_12_2018/dx8dfyp/).

I just closed my long here right below 9k. I expect a small correction soon and will start scaling in a long position when that happens. Or, I will start scaling in once we break 9.2k.
Closed my long from $8,130 at around $8,830. 

I had every intention of holding it indefinitely, but the fact that RSI is as hot as it is has me a bit concerned. 

I'd like to take a step away for a day or two to see how the market behaves. 

Edit: opened a hedge short at $8,815. Stops above $9,010 or so. 
Genuine question to the skeptics and bears.  I know this break from the long term log has been soft and perhaps seemingly premature, but do you really think we’re going to move back under the resistance and completely switch directions  in coming weeks to continue the downtrend?

In all my crash comparisons, breaking log resistance has lead to sustained rally period. I’m expecting this to touch on $12k before we know if the bear market is actually over ... but reading some comments from yesterday and today it seems many don’t feel similarly. 

I’m curious to know why?
Futures are *still* negative. At this point, something is clearly being manipulated cause futures *should* be in the positive by now. There's no reason why they wouldn't be.
Looking at the massive support in the order book at 8.4 and the fact that it was not breached even momentarily yesterday, it's pretty clear it would take an exorbitant amount of selling pressure to push the price under 8.4 but if it does go under it could get ugly fast. 

I doubt it drops under but it would make me decidedly bearish if it were to do so. In any case, I've put buy bids all around 8.4-8.6 and hope they hit and will probably set a stop under 8.1. 

Also, can I please stop getting auto filtered? u/jenninsea. Hard to get interaction or interact when people don't see my post until an hour later. 
If this weekly closes above the log line I'm going to start scaling back in. Fomo is going to be strong and I am starting to believe OTC buyers are going to have to bleed into exchanges if these reports (rumors) of unfilled bids are real.

EDIT: weekly*
If the hour ends like this it could be a shooting star. It seems like people are about to take profits.
Having been out of position and mostly in fiat during yesterday's run-up, I have now started to buy in again, and plan to buy more over the next days (not taking a margin position though), based on the assumption that this is a much needed short-term "breather" before further rise, up and away from the log-downtrend line. 

With this ongoing breather, RSI looks less heated to me on most time scales (1hr ok again, daily still in ok), only 4hr and 6hr are still bordering overbought.

On the topic of RSI, a quick thought/question:

During the run-ups of the last year we had RSI>70 sustained for longer time periods up to and including the daily, so my guess is that *if* indeed we enter a short-/mid-term rally, there is no point of waiting for situations when RSI is near oversold, because that simply won't happen, or at least I would be missing out on much of the upwards movement with such a conservative strategy.

Is that also how others think about RSI in the current situation?
Looks like healthy consolidation on the 4H. Already establishd higher low and we should have a lower high if this price holds for another 15 minutes. RSI has cooled off on the lower time frames. Expect a tightening equilibrium before the next break. 

100% BTC with SL set at 8550.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/VsYA2UTK/
Wtf is this shit, 99% bots circlejerking the price up with no volume, feels so wrong
4/21/18 UPDATE. We've decisively broken through the ATH down channel and taken the first option from my last chart on [4/20/18 PM](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8dksw2/daily_discussion_friday_april_20_2018/dxpjn1m/). Please note: the ATH down channel and first scenario arrow, ["Bull Case" from 4/19/18,](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8dbx5s/daily_discussion_thursday_april_19_2018/dxmuylf/) are now in grey, the prior channel is in a lighter shade of grey.

While we appear to be in a well defined channel (the upper black line is the resistance, the bright green line is the immediate support), I don't know how well this will hold. I have four short-term scenarios.

Here’s the [zoomed out, macro view](https://www.tradingview.com/x/LB8XtodA/).     
Here’s the [extended channel](https://www.tradingview.com/x/jlX2NM9B/).     
Here’s the [four scenarios](https://www.tradingview.com/x/l7FAMtcM/).     

**Uber Bull Case:** This assumes the channel will hold with the bright green line as a support. This gives us a price target of $9,800 by April 29.     

**Bull Case:** This means we drop out of the immediate channel (the bright green line) but stay within the moderate channel (the black lines). I'm unable to assign a realistic price target here, but we'd likely be somewhere between $8,500-$8,700.     

**Sideways Case:** This implies we drop out of the immediate channel and moderate channel, but we bounce off a very brief support created on 4/9 and 4/12 (light blue line). I can't assign a realistic price target, but a descent into this range would likely be indicated by a drop within the next 48 hours to $8,600.     

**Bear Case:** This implies we drop out of the immediate and moderate channel, along with blowing through the brief support created on 4/9 and 4/12. This would be signaled by a drop below $8,000 after May 1.
This is the ascending wedge I'll be keeping an eye on (same as others have posted quite a bit): https://www.tradingview.com/x/RKGibvSV/

If the log trend line from ATH breaks down, I think we looking at support around 7.8k where the double 12h kijun / single 1d kijun is sitting.

I closed my long at just under 9k, and started scaling in a long at 8650 again (double 2h tenkan: https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8dtgp5/daily_discussion_saturday_april_21_2018/dxq31a9/).

I'm ready to continue scaling the long until 7.8k.
[deleted]
The daily was painted red to green 10 minutes before the close then reversed right in the *first minute* of the new daily candle.
[removed]
Good morning... I moved my stop on the long to 8420 last night thinking that i shouldnt get greedy. Waking up to this has been a lovely surprise. Gonna let this long run, one of my best trades - opened at 6725 with half my stack at 3x 
fucking bitmex shits itself everytime we experience a little volatility, how the fuck am i supposed to open or close positions huh get your shit together bitmex , honestly not very happy at all with bitmex, what about those with large positions? This completely fucks up those with larger positions in the game, basically stop loss or its time to lose your money should the price start taking a walk in the other direction with decent volume. I cannot comprehend how a large exchange such as bitmex offering such high stakes trading can't even get their shit together to handle some volume. Poor form really bitmex, poor form.
Could see a retest of 8.5k in earnest, before a retest of 9k today. 

Edit: That said, I am not considering making any changes to existing positions though, I'm standing PAT until we encounter next resistance pivot of 9.4k or a decisive break under 8.5k with volume (with ETH first leading a strong break down beneath 594)
Testing the tenkan sen resistance on the weekly. The TK cross is still the only bearish signal on this timeframe, in particular the kumo has decidedly not turned red. The current uptrend is aiming directly for this kumo shoulder at ca. 11k, but I don't see us getting there this time around. More likely we'll sell off and go under here, before retesting and possibly rising above via the window of thin cloud towards September. 

1w: https://www.tradingview.com/x/zUtR65Zu

Some stranger was kind enough to call me smart money earlier, and I'm happy to follow up on that by saying my target on the daily was spot on (*cf*. [my post of 10 days ago](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8b4twg/daily_discussion_tuesday_april_10_2018/dx4m45z/)). Not so sure however about the scenario from here. There's a couple of days to get above the cloud, and the lagging span has a way to go, but upside targets on this chart remain sub-10k, so I'm not closing out the remaining portion of my long just yet. 

1d: https://www.tradingview.com/x/UqesLdwo 

Any correction here could be quite strong, judging by the 12h. We've come a long way from support with the kijun and the kumo still at 7.8k (until early May for the latter). Given that length of time, my best upside guess for the ST is 9.5k, which would be a failed chikou breakout in the three coming days (*cf*. daily kumo resistance). Anything above that and I think we're going to hit sleeping limit orders.

12h: https://www.tradingview.com/x/cCUDfUSo
And this is why going down and checking for support is so important. Since we've only gone up for the past week essentially everyone is in profit so, now, when that price ticker is approaching your entry point you'll take profit and the price just cascades down. The question is now how much profit taking will there be and will it overcome demand? My guess is there will be several bounces but we'll go down the same way we came up, in waves. And we came up pretty far so those who are exiting now and who shorted now will see low 8's as a good re-entry/close so we'll probably find support there. And if we just bounce here at 8.8 without going down further, that would indeed be very bullish and we'll probably go to 10k without another pitstop. However, the problem will just persist and we'll have an even bigger drop later. I read from Chewy awhile back that you gotta feed the bears once in awhile otherwise it will get ugly later.
Some perspective on where we were about two weeks ago: 

https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/89wnoa/comment/dwujord?st=JG93GMGV&sh=9425ab4d
~~Tempted to short this, but i've only had bad experience with shorts.~~
Didn't expect this 9k breach this soon. And we've clearly pulled back from this. I think we'll go down to 8.5 to retest our support there over this weekend.  

EDIT: 
Decided to add to my trade instead.
Added another 10% of my trade stack to my long on 8710. (5x leverage)

I'm not going to be suprised if we drop below 8.5, perhaps back to 8.3 over the weekend. I will probably add 10% of my stack on both targets if we get there.

Most expected a pullback on the log line, it would make a lot of sense for this to play out which is why I think it won't. Not as straight forward as everyone expects it to. 

It was also my plan yesterday night when i reopened my position on a 5x long.

I took the time tonight to draw out a new chart. https://www.tradingview.com/x/yLSwB0jm/

I'll leave most of the analysis to others, but here are a few highlights that I see:

* We are in an ascending wedge, which has the potential to break bearishly. The extreme apex of the wedge is appx 9600.

* If we fall from the ascending wedge, we'd hopefully use the ATH log line as resistance. If not, there is still major support in the 8000-8500 area. Falling below 8000 would be quite bearish in my view.

* If we climb to 9100 and are rejected again, it has the potential to be either a short-term double-top formation (double from yesterday), or a stronger triple-top formation (from yesterday and March 20/22)

* Large Adam-and-Eve formation at appx 11.7, which would be very bullish if confirmed. Or, if we climb to 11.7 too quickly again we could reject it as a triple-top.

Edit: I see others have an ascending wedge that apex's around 10k. Different ways to draw everything, obviously. BTW, I welcome any feedback or armchair predictions. 

[removed]
shorts are covering on this dump
Let's talk about measuring gains...

How do you all measure your gains? Are just looking at absolute fiat gains? Or fiat gains compared to some HODL index? Or just BTC gains? I know everyone does this differently, but it would be interesting with some perspective.

And what's your view on gains in relation to good risk management practices? In my own case, I exited entirely into fiat when we broke below 7.3k after the decent from 11.7k (arguably a bit late, but whatever). And since 6.8k I've been scaling back into long positions again. I'm still not all-in crypto yet.

Because of my scaling strategy, in hindsight I would have obviously performed better just hodling 100% crypto since the recent price pumps are outperforming a scaling strategy.

Hind sight is of course 20/20. But do you consider your trading as "bad performance" if you're not outperforming a HODL strategy during certain times?
So, should I consider these low volume movements as "nobody is dumping, so price will rise" or "nobody is pumping, so price will fall"?
Long 8780 - 100% bitcoin
is it safe to assume that, as time goes by, fat finger sells / ragequits  tend to diminish. The lower the price goes the more likely it ends up at cold storage/long term believers.
still going up eh? If we break 9.2k this weekend, I will chug a liter of beer (mass) at a Munich Beer Garden in celebration.

Every bone in my body says hedge. Meh... who cares :)

I’m down on my trading stack (nothing major), but very careful to not revenge trade here. Will be withdrawing coins most likely. After two trades that ate a loss, time to re-evaluate 
Let's say everything goes perfect and shoot up towards $20k. Predictions for what will happen from then? I am assume lots of resistance up there again and could bounce off like last time.
We either break $8920 with conviction or the ascending wedge comes into play and we drop. 

I've actually closed my long and now short from $8880.
Bitcoin checker woke me up, I was not surprised one bit when I saw the price. Buying pressure was strong, selling pressure was weak (kinda like we experienced two times since the new year). I don't want to be a smartass, but this last couple of days felt like the bears are hibernating and letting bulls push the price higher. Every time since the BGD bulls were pushing and rejecting any serious selloffs, and I was confused by the market behavior. It was like bears completely vanished from the market. Then I remembered that I have already experienced a similar situation when BTC was pushing to 11,5k. 

&nbsp;

Logline broken on smaller timeframes is indicating that the market does not want BTC in freefall anymore, not in any case trend reversal, at least not yet.
Strong resistance to 9k - 9.2k zone is crucial, that's higher high and would confirm that the trend is slowly changing: https://www.tradingview.com/x/5i4VH7Yi/

&nbsp;

For this not to be a fakeout BTC should consolidate over 8500 today, even higher, and in the next couple of days or shorter fully recharged to test this resistance again. Falling through log support would be bad and it would confirm that market is behaving the same like in 2014 crash, even if we continue sliding downwards on this support: https://www.tradingview.com/x/D7c7fg3W/

Zoomed in:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/Wqv3RH1H/

&nbsp;

What's worrying me the most is that some of the alts I am closely watching recovered almost by 100% from the last lows, and last time that happened we were testing logline on 11,5k. I am still shorting this market, building layered positions and expecting a drop from 9,2k. Don't get me wrong, I am not a bear nor TA expert, it's just common sense to me that crypto market has to crash more, too many shitcoins still getting attention, pumps and even existing. This is not BTC bubble, this is a cryptomarket bubble, which total value exactly 365 days ago was 12 times lower then it is now, and almost 30 times lower from ATH: https://coinmarketcap.com/charts/

&nbsp;

If the market breaks down and confirms its crash pattern, I don't expect the same scenario like in 2014 and long bear market. Things have changed and are changing daily. If BTC breaks upwards and creates a higher high, there are 1000 different scenarios the price could behave, but I really doubt we will have another strong bull run like in 2017. 

&nbsp;

It looks like now the support is holding, rejecting any further drops under 8600 which is good bullish sign with higher lows. Good luck to everyone, trade safe and smart.
higher lows bois. shits gonna pop
9.2 confirms inverted H&S. Thats the level im looking at for now. Then further into the distance 11.7 confirms adam and eve.
[deleted]
Did the walls got eaten or pulled? 
[removed]
So with all this daily closing in fun weve had, i thought, would you see any value on charting daily candles, but with daily candles price hour being randomized using values from a distribution. 
[removed]
took profits @ 9040

wicked into and bounced off of 1d kijun: https://i.imgur.com/vG965NK.png

kijun has acted as ironclad resistance the past 3 times price reached kijun: https://i.imgur.com/YS8Ec0Y.png

will be re-entering if price breaks kijun and cloud resistance for an edge-to-edge trade. seeing as the kijun and cloud resistance are very close together, breaking both would be very bullish imo.

Morning.  Took some profit at 8900 from my 8100 long.  I'll probably regret it but I hear that it's good to take profit.  
Have a good day!
New to investing - New to BTC - Slowly beginning to understand the terms you are all using, I'm educating myself. I have a lot to catch up on. Please correct me if I'm wrong - is this ongoing argument between bulls and bears and BTC related to the fact that BTC spent so long hovering in the low hundreds of dollars, only to recently shoot upward and crash? Is it all now just speculation whether it'll reach $20,000 again or just fizzle out? 
I'm loving this community!
I really don't understand all this Bears v Bulls...3k v 12k.  If I had my own way we would all make good money.  It's just a difference of opinion at that particular time.
soooo close to breaking even after 4 months of hodling!
Question to the more experienced TA folks...is it possible that the rising support line from the Sept low through 6k, that turned resistance, is now support again?  It looks to me like that's where the local bottom was recently as it bounced right off that line.  Just curious if it being violated in both directions weakens that idea.

https://imgur.com/a/x8zX9fx
New at TA, but this battle for $8800 seems to be key to determining if we move up or down in the next few hours/day. Or is it not too important? 
I see 2 more major resistance points.

9k, which is the current 3day long term moving average

10k, which is the weekly long term moving average

If we get past those and to 12k, we start looking at an Adam and eve confirmation from a 6k double bottom.  If confirmed, it should break up, putting us to 15k or more.

Taking a step back, 15k at the end of this year is probably on track for where we would have been anyways if the mania bubble hadn't hit.




Let's get a roll call of the remaining bears who still have the gall to say we're going down to $3k. Would be insightful to see some contrarian opinions and how they're formed.
I'd like to coin a new formation. The stairway to heaven. 
https://www.tradingview.com/x/xUMQUGjo/

Ascending wedge still in play?
The [ascending wedge](https://prnt.sc/j86br0) seems to be holding still, seems like a short play might be valid if we break the support line of the wedge, I am waiting for 9K to be double rejected or broken to enter a postition or after we have stepped outside of our wedge universe.
Will it break 9000 this time... lets see. 

If it hits 9300 I will change my flair. :)
Looking at horizontal resistance levels on the daily here. Whole number resistance at 9K, 9.1-9.5 is a thicket of support lines from earlier this year on the way down, then: $10K. The magical $10K, where FOMO kicks in after lotsa mainstream media articles. 
trying to learn a bit about the market and its signs.
So, lets see if i learned something from the last weeks, decreasing volume, flattening price movements.. we're about to make a move? (down?)
I took it as a given that the log-scale downward channel resistance would not be broken. Now I'm just watching Bitcoin go up, unable to enter :(
Does this look like a decent place to open a new long? It seem to have retraced back below 8.7k which should be good enough to get ready for another attempt at 9k or above.. what do u say?
Seems our long term support turned resistance is turning into support again?
I spent a little bit of time with my mining rig this morning, I looked at it, it looked at me knowingly and we went our different ways.

Mining returns have jumped 50% this week pretty much across the board.
In the event of a downtrend, what’s our support?
Lets see if the downtrend line can work as support now.. Would be more bullish than sitting in a no-mans land around 9kish
I believe we test resistance is now support, perhaps several times, and consolidate for weeks in this area close above the line before finally moving up and reaching new ATH’s in July.  Whilst we consolidate alt season will continue until BTC starts the move up and crushes most of them.

Below 6k isn’t going to happen, it’s an important figure for large funds that are now in the market.  Key signs were Pantera calling the bottom and OTC demand sub 8k so strong large buyers were struggling to get orders filled.
Someone is putting in a lot of effort over at BFX to push the price up. Buy walls being moved up every time the price gets a little higher. Bigger players probably not yet ready to let this market decide for itself. Lets see if it works and turns the selling tide.
I bought more now. I got liquidated for my whole stack last month, but I was able to buy some before the first BGD at 6.8 and I couldn't resist the fomo tonight. so it can go ahead and retrace now, sorry guys
looks like we are testing resistance turned support at the log lone. I expect it to hold
Currently:
https://www.tradingview.com/x/fte8opae/

Here's my prediction based on the 2014 correction / bear period:
https://www.tradingview.com/x/LzMRQfIJ/

What if the price grinds down, staying above the ATH log resistance-turned-support just like 2014?

The ascending wedge could transform into an ascending channel with a higher low around 8300 by end of April 2018.
[removed]
Does someone have a plot (or the data) of "users here now" on this sub vs time? I'd be curious to see the curve over the past months.
BTC/USD was over $100 lower than BitMex swaps for quite a while. Currently $60 lower. 
What is happening on Kraken when I see something like this?

https://imgur.com/lDTH1yY
Big volume pumps and low volume dumps, the bulls are really pushing a heavy bolder up hill
Genuine question, as I want to learn, is it not concerning that there has not been any kind of proper retracement since around $6600? I had been expecting at least something minor over the last couple of days but it shot up further. Can this kind of rise be considered sustainable? 
Raging bearish impulse here, if it's bought up I foresee green pastures ahead, if not... There's no support lol
Do you guys still use tether? 

It seems like a couple months ago many were afraid of doing that and now almost no one is talking about it, although pretty much nothing has changed since then.

Do you still think it's the biggest scam in crypto? Would be a statement 'not trusting tether equals not trusting bitfinex' correct in your opinion? 
Futures premium is *still* in negative territory. This is just not right.
Hey guys, where’s next support if this breaks down?
https://www.tradingview.com/x/PxjC8VO1/

Is that highlighted decline and subsequent ascent not too perfectly formed?

Bots now programmed to show 'organic' price movement as well?
FOMOed in last evening (I admit it) with a margin long. Liquidation is 8430... I was quite sure we would go to 9200 and we did buuuuuttt I didn't wake up to my alarm. I just rolled over haha. My thinking is that I might be safe in that 8500 is back below the descending channel and that a firm breakout won't dip back in? Anyways... dumb move, but just wanted to get thoughts and share mine (and share a losing trade if this goes south from here).
Whales are **always** controlling it. If they weren't, they wouldn't be called whales. When trends hit a standstill, it's big money that offsets inertia, smart money that drives momentum, and dumb money that gets caught up in the dynamics. If you've never traded or invested in other assets, **don't** claim crypto is different. It's not. 

In crypto, vol may be high, the underlying tech may be new, and noobs may currently abound, but markets are markets. Candle-stick charts were developed by rice traders in the 18^th century. Bots have been active in finance since the last quarter of the 20^th century. Manipulation is as old as the very first market. Derivatives and margin trading are also ubiquitous. 

If you don't have huge sums of money, there's only two categories for you to fit into: smart money or dumb money.
If 9k is not broken, we could technically be looking at another double top pattern. Correct?
[removed]
so when using these apps like LTCpay does the consumer have to put their keys to their wallets into the app software? what gives the app the permission to conduct the transaction on the blockchain
I'm long from 8,803. I should have closed it at 8,910, but instead we went back down to 8,865. I hope we get back up there so I can take more profit on this.
Good morning, this was a crazy night I sleept through. My short from 8520 got rekt at 8700 (I thought it would move maybe and touch it but I cut through)

Reshorted 8920 here as a possible scalping trade
What's more likely; 8k or 9.5k in the next day or two?
Here we go... (long again)
[deleted]
[removed]
Scaling in some buys from:
     8300-8550 with stops below 8300

Scaling in some sells from: 
      8900-9200 with stops over 9200   
[2014 comparision](https://i.imgur.com/Z9xyWiq.png)

I'm long from 7700 and despite this amazing run I'm trying to be mindful that anything can happen.  My plan for my next buy is to wait for the pull back to low 8k and if it doesn't recover then I may consider going shorting again.
Personally I’m quite entertained by all these bart formations over the last few weeks. It’s the same drama each time...will we go up? Will we burn?  Always with compelling reasons to take each side of the trade.  But when the suspense is broken, the relief is short lived before another conundrum is thrown at you. 

Right now for example, we have seen a bullish breakout. If you are in fiat do you wait for the retrace and a testing of the resistance to get a better entry price, or do you fomo in here because the surge up could be strong enough to leave you on the sidelines?  

I’ve been 100% in since 7800. Interested to see how you guys are playing it right now
Hey fellas wanted to share this live analysis and trading stream of Bitcoin price action. Open discussion for anyone interested!

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=b9uUspAuqZs](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=b9uUspAuqZs)
Daily Bitcoin Update (4/21/18) + Technical Analysis

https://youtu.be/Jkk0IZmylNo
Live Bitcoin price analysis with some trading sprinkled in as well. Open discussion for anyone interested.

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1T0wnpEafuE](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1T0wnpEafuE)
Its taking a lot of volume to pump this and almost nothing to bring it back down to earth. Still, if the big alts can keep rising (mainly ETH) then it should push BTC over the top as well. ETH looks ready for a pullback as well though.
Aren't there way too many longs as compared to shorts? Couldn't this setup for a possible long squeeze (or whatever it's called) play? 
Good news, I should be back in by the end of May.

Bad news, I'm totally missing out.
Was just about to FOMO in before that drop! Literally saved by the doorbell!

EDIT: Although it isn't much of a drop.
My long got closed overnight at $8985, back in another from $8780 now.  I don't see $9k staying around for long.  Waiting for media to pick up recovery, the noobs will be back. 
[removed]
Someone is protecting their liquidation point at 9100.
I still don't understand why people sell Alts when BTC is going up. When going up, dollar value of alts goes up and Satoshi value does not change, same as being in BTC. So why change?
[deleted]
[deleted]
[removed]
I'm seeing a huge symmetrical triangle, and we've now broken out of it on the upside: https://imgur.com/a/hm81B1T

One argument against it is that we've previously dipped below it into the $6400 dip.
[removed]
[deleted]
hey guys, a bit unrelated to trading but still has to do with bitcoin, but here is goes..

how do you stay humble? I find myself getting to God tier levels of hubris even just after making a Tuna sub worth of gains and then saying stupid shit to people like "have fun living paycheck to paycheck" and "yea try being retired at 29 fuckface"

I really have to get that horrible personality flaw out of me, especially since i'm probably just average or maybe below average. I know some of you guys are probably 100x to 1000x my net worth and you still come here to help people, so thats why i decided to ask here.

edit: yo btw i'm not retired and i'm one bad mistake away from living paycheck to paycheck, anyway, a few of you gave it to me real like I needed, and i'll be keeping myself in check from here on forth. Much appreciation for this subreddit as always.
What a fakeout on GDAX!
[removed]
I hate looking at small timeframes and seeing clear patterns and knowing i must not trust them. Just look at the C&H in the 1h... 
[removed]
Good morning traders!

Hopefully we all are in good positions.

I am particularly waiting for $9,100 to be crossed. We don't have much after it and it will be a quick ride to $10,000 afterwards unless someone decides to unload (which is not very likely at this stage). 

Perhaps we will keep going higher and higher after $10,000. 

[removed]
Guys, give me some perspective here.
Shorts are going down and covering but price keeps going lower today. Does this mean:
Underwater shorts are covering while price is going down?
Or is there just tremendous sell pressure?
That last bitcoin I traded started with a 6xxx. *sigh* Back in btc @8625. And eth @572. Nailed that short term bottom. Hope it sticks. Stops under this recent low. 
I can't decide if we will test 9k or 8.6k first. What do you all think?
Should I short or should I long ? 
After falling wedge breakout, the first major resistance right before us  somewhere around  9, 9,2. The second will be imho  around 11.5.  Will we break this resistance and go to 11 or we fall back ?  And how far if we do... to 8.2 ? Or 7.8 ?  
My vana be wife ...said go short. WTF should I do ? 
Two bots trading against each other on leveraged BitMeX.. what could possibly go wrong?
[removed]
Cute dip, here come the alts. I think.
[deleted]
Rsi being ignored it's a very strong trend signal. 
I have a fib line at 8440. Also, ~8450s was our local high after the BGD. Old resistance could possibly become newer support, I'm looking for a retrace to that level.
When you refer to a correction to 8.2-8.4, does that imply that we would still stay on the upside of the log trend line from ATH? If we break below the trend line I'd be a bit worried...
Chilling too. I think this will take 3-5 days to show. My instinct is that this will move to $12k min. 

Stops below the log line in case it turns
Well done for ur patience and discipline. Seems like a very good trade indeed. 
Damn. Not to take away merit from your excellent trade but has chewy *ever* been wrong? Honest question.
nice trade man
I expected this to drop a little over the weekend.  The fact that it hasn't makes me think its going to keep going.  Guess we'll see how RSI works here.
You’re on one hell of a winning streak. If this pulls back overnight, that will just be amazing.  

Strong trades over the past month.  Good work 
I thought you weren't going to short and it's not a criticism of you but I think it's funny how fast bullish confidence collapses. This rise has been artificial as all hell and so far has only produced a lower high on the back of liquidated shorts. Pretty obvious bull trap even if it gets to 12k. 
I have basically been mirroring you and making good profits. Thank you. 
Thanks for the update. I think that's some sage advice re: RSI. I use Stoch RSI with slightly altered inputs and while there's still a bit of room on the upper range, it appears a small cool down period is imminent. I think some sideways consolidation for 24-48 hours would be healthy to keeping an organic price.
Yeah feels double toppy. Hedge is the only reasonable position to open 
Short term between 8.5k and the point before 12k is tested, the market is bullish with sentiment in alts confirming.  As we approach 12k market will probably respond more skittishly since this will be another key battleground to gauge in intermediate term whether a bull market is happening or a part of an elongatation of the overall bear trend since January.  This will actually be a very common narrative at various price levels ahead even if making new local highs, remember BTC is facing an uphill climb from it's ATH.  There will be significant opportunities for long and short before ATH is breached and it may take a long time if it ever gets there.  No matter what though, there will be plenty of profitable trading opportunities if you don't get locked down into a permaperspective. 
If you loved someone and they kept punching you in the face would you trust them not to do it again?
We don't have to go to under the resistance to continue a downtrend. It could become a downward support.  That's what 2014 did.
[deleted]
[deleted]
Has Bitcoin fundamentally changed into a more useful instrument? Unfortunately, no. Is it probable that we will see another megahype just after the last bubble has popped? Not really.

So market might try to stay unreasonable for a while, and interested parties might try to prop it up for a while, but ultimately bitcoin is still overvalued at today's prices.

My 2 cents anyway. 
[deleted]
Miners hedging? As I understand it, it takes allot of capital to play that game, arbitrage may just be slow from lack of awake investment to do so.
This actually worries me in my long position. 

My sense is that buyers may show as price direction continues up (if it does) and news cycles entice new money, but wonder if this might collapse as a premature move (I think sideways or retesting log is likely in the short term, and won’t threaten my position.  But I’ll exit if we actually move below resistance).  

I was hopping for log break at lower bought levels as I’d be more confident in my position.  In my mind this break out is tepid because there was a long run up prior and not a lot of room to move up now in this group of mostly crypto gamblers/bots using charts. I know that new money or sideline money needs to enter for this to keep moving up. 

What do you think is going to happen?
Don’t trade the order book :(
New accounts and negative karma accounts get autofiltered for a while. We allow through the messages when we see them, if they're decent. It shouldn't take you long to work your way out of the filter.
3D closes tonight too btw.
When you say unfilled bids, you mean limit buy orders placed consistently low enough not to be filled and the frustration and fomo of the situation means a cancellation and a market order instead?
When does the weekly candle close?
Is there a source/url for these reports/rumors? Thanks!
That's what the learned folks here are saying. RSI has less influence when in a rally / FOMO but more reliable during range bound activity.

I think it breaks down when there's outright FOMO / Mania.  I don't think we're even remotely near that currently though.
I think the december rally had pretty clear indicators despite overbought RSI alone (I wasn't into TA or trading at all back then, so just assuming here) 

I think we had a 2K candle at one point (when price was arround 7/8k) that pretty much set things on fire. 

Sentiment was clearly much different aswell, the bull trend was already in a long phase but the real rally didn't begin untill late november.
It does but that is part of the market. If the market didn't want it then they would be punished for it, and maybe they still will. 
high volume -> manipulation

low volume -> boring bots
Do you take a position on one of the scenarios you posted?
Good analysis
Are you using log scale and on which of the charts? Thanks!
Was looking for a plan after my overnight limit buys didn't fill (close, but no corn) and this feels reasonable. Ichimoku *seems* like it's been really good at at least visualizing this market.

I'll add a catastrophic stop buy above $9,300.
For me, it's "margin buy $15 (market order) once every weekend, add $14 to existing sell orders. Usually $4 at 2% and 4% above purchase, and $6 at 6%". I've been doing that for two months. It's helped me scratch the trading itch without getting myself in trouble. 
You mean UTC?
Someone wanted to paint the daily green. Look at that massive volume it took to push the price up in the last 10 mins.
daily was painted yesterday also
But yeah, there's totally not any manipulation /s
Spoofy bot on Bitfinex probably works on a certain time schedule
is there a bitmex rep looking into this? Honestly this seems like ( put on your tinfoil caps boys ) a pretty good way to liquidate people and earn even more money as whales and plankton alike scream in frustration as they are only able to watch the price fuck around with just a lil more volume whilst they are greeted by "RECONNECTING TO BITMEX -We're having some trouble keeping the live datafeed to BitMEX open. What is this? " not very useful at all especially when you notice a trend forming in the opposite direction you'd like it to be, and want to close your position asap.


So Bitmex is the new Kraken?
Thanks for the analysis, always an interesting read.

So you are generally bullish on both the 1d and 12h, but suggesting that when there finally will be a correction, it will be either to 8500 or even 7800?


would it not be Very bearish if we broke downwards through the downward trendline again so soon after breaking through it?
I haven't seen a 1 minute bitcoin chart in MONTHS
Yeah, about a thousand shorts closed vs. 500 longs closing which makes me feel we can go even lower. I'll start to feel we are at a bottom when shorts start going up while the price goes down.
I think of fiat value primarily, because I am in this to make money, not to start a revolution. I also track BTC value of my stack to find out if I am beating the market or not.
In three ways:

1. Short-term trades / Active Trades: These gains goes directly to fund the expenses account. This is regardless of my expenses. Obviously, I have to forecast my expenses not to have to run into my capital. Otherwise, it goes for the next months (ie: I have 1.5 year expenses reserve) and from 2 years I generally go on spending/travelling spree. That is if I made a good or a few good trades.

2. Long-term trades: These are accumulation trades. 1 year at least for a trade. I only track the asset amount, and almost never the value. This helps a lot emotionally.

3. Capital Management: Low Risk and always looking/working on diversifying the portfolio as much as possible. Capital return is re-invested. The exception will be if short-term trading fails me and I need to expense from the dividends.
You should work out what the average case is for your trading strategy, and compare to that.

For example I trade bitcoin, dollar and ETH. Because I handle each asset exactly the same, I expect to have an 1/3 split of each asset on average. I calculate what would happen if I had that split (continuously re-balancing), and compare that to my actual results.

Measuring your profits only in dollars or only in bitcoin is just dumb in my opinion.
In the short term my only concern is accumulating more BTC regardless of its value. Not a revolutionary or anything but I do believe long term the value if BTC will be much greater than in is now.  In 5-10 years hopefully I can use my BTC as currency or trade it all back for $ whatever makes the most sense at the time. 
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
yes.

Depending on the trend, it can mean reversal. But keep in mind also happens in corrections, and this looks a lot more like a correction of the bullish trend.
Stops?

Everything is looking good for another move up from a TA perspective. Another few hours of this sideways movement should improve the bulls' chances.
How to lose money 101.
Bravo! What's your Liq. Point?
I'll chug along with you man.
Thin air to 1 million, no resistance at all. John will not eat his dick and world peace will be achieved.
It depends. 

Lets just say that to me there is no other thing that has any predictive power (in a synthetic market) aside from EW. 

Using EW in very long term scenarios, i have two predictions. 

1- We are in a wave 5 of an overcorrected bullish cycle : https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/tk7wlMPA-Bullish-EW-prediction-wishful-thinking/ (not mine)

2- From 2014, we are in wave 5 of a very big cycle, were 1 is the first bubble, 2, the mtgox debacle, 3 the growth up until 20k, 4 the bear market, and this would be wave 5 . Which would realistically put us in non-dick-eating-Mccafee territory, which is sad. 

But i dont really believe in both of those, but they would look quite pretty. so really, no fucking clue. 
Tight channel around the log chart trend line.

https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/Gl6Zz3Gb-The-Mcaffee-1-000-000-bitcoin-target-by-2020-bet-chart/
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
If it hits 20k it'll come crashing down again. Maybe not as far as before but it's the ultimate resistance level.

If it gets close it'll take forever to go through because people won't want to chance it.
What if my arm bursts?
I don't think Bitcoin will approach 20k again until we get some positive news, in the unlikely event we did I doubt we'd break it. 

I could see MAST providing a boost when it goes live, but I think we'll need more than that.
Why should it shoot up towards 20K ?  Even the current price is ridiculous and artificially overpriced, i see zero reasons why the price should hit 20K
I totally agree with you on the whole "unproven Alts are overvalued" theory. But I think Alts will always pump and will not be killed by anything short of very heavy regulations (i.e. securities classification). Even in extremely long bear markets, some alts survive. And these shorter bear cycles are hardly a test on the alts, as we can see as soon as BTC rears it's head, 99% of alts pump like crazy. This wont change for now.
"too many shitcoins still getting attention, pumps and even existing"

That might just be the new norm now.  If fiat to altcoin pairs do come in, I see BTC's role in the space diminishing.  

I think we can go as low as 7.3 and it would still be bullish. Hell, as long as we stay above 6.5 we are in a possible trend reversal. A higher low is all we need to start drawing an upward channel.
The alt bubble is real but will exist in some form only until the market is decided by things beyond speculation 
>it's just common sense to me that crypto market has to crash more, too many shitcoins still getting attention, pumps and even existing.

This is a terrible subjective thing to base any trading decisions on.

I’ll also never understand how btc investors got so stuffy and conservative.  Didn’t you invest in bitcoin at one time when it was an even more stupid and wild and crazy idea and had almost no chance of succeeding?  And look how that turned out for people that took that risk.  Every single thing btc maximalists throw at alts applies even more so to this fake internet money that bitcoin was.  At some point btc people were the bleeding edge of crypto innovation and risky and wanted change and suddenly they do an about face and btc investors are about as forward thinking as your average 80 year old bank president, it’s quite a bizarre phenomenon.  It will cost you money just like it cost all the btc naysayers money back in the day.
The thing I don’y understand about the alts is what people are doing investing in the alts that are proven to be worthless.

XRP... garbage

IOTA... riddled with holes and their client implementation is a joke

EOS... does this even exist yet?

Cardano... Cool, but far away from ready

Zec... Ummm... ok.

XLM... love it, but why do I need to hold Lumens to use their tech... its for banks, not consumers

ERC20 tokens... Look at Augur. It’s been almost 3 years and still nada.

Nano, NEO, DAG bs coins... do people really think this will be the future

Verge, VeChain, Walton etc... I mean... I just don’t see it. Wouldnt a central database work just fine. CouchDB has replication and sharded states. And managing that at production is hard enough. Why use a blockchain.

I just don’t see it to he honest
> Don't get me wrong, I am not a bear nor TA expert, it's just common sense to me that crypto market has to crash more, too many shitcoins still getting attention, pumps and even existing.

The lack of self awareness in crypto is amazing.  BTC itself is already an overvalued bubble that isn't used for anything other than speculation and buying from the black market, and Monero does the second job better anyways.
lower highs bois, shits gonna drop
I see lower highs.
I think 9.2k is a very important level as well, but not because of the inverted head and shoulder. That neckline is too diagonal IMO.

9.2k is important mostly because that's the most recent high, and because we would have broken the 12h double cloud with some margin then: https://www.tradingview.com/x/wzMRdr6Y/
Bitfinex is the best if you need to use leverage. Its impossible to trade reliably on bitmex anymore, their servers cant handle the load. 100% of my income used to be from bitmex, not anymore lol. Trying to scalp movements there these days is more likely to give you a loss when u and everyone is forced to market close 
[deleted]
Price/volume distribution?
And its gone, no vegeta today.
So if 9040 breaks your in?
I've got pretty much the same plan in place. I will definitely enter upon breaking the double 1d kijun, but I will also consider scaling back in long if we retrace below the double 1 hour tenkan.

Edit: I think I'll scale back in below the double 2h tenkan instead. We're correcting sooner than I thought.
Quick question, is there a tool on tradingview or any other platform that automatically draws kijun lines and such. I’m still in the process of learning the basics of TA. Any suggestions would be greatly appreciated. Thanks!
Did the exact same move after seeing how well it called the previous two 11.6k tops. In the back of my mind I wonder if this is the local top and will see a lower low based on how it played out previously.
Never regret taking profit. The real pro isn't the guy that manages to hit the peak. It's the guy that walks away with his winnings in his pocket each time he has them.
Bulls and bears is more of a yin & yang thing
It isnt. Bear thinks it will go down, bull thinks it will go up. You can be both in different timeframes, and depending on the timesframes your opinion must be very different. 

You can think it will go back to 3k and still think it will grow 10000% long term.
The 20k price target is half speculation half and strong opinions founded on fundamentals.  There are legit ways to value assets and finding value is what investors try to do.  With stock, you look for low PE ratios.  With housing, you look for a low price compared to similar local property.  With bitcoin, investors are quick to point out stats such as gold, being the old form of currency, has 9T in value currently circulating on the market while USD has 22T M1 + M2.  Bitcoins market cap is currenrly less than 200B by comparison, so there are strong arguments the price will continue to go up over the long run.
one of the best communities on the internet. I’d read a lot here and find your guys and gals you see eye to eye with. I’d also get yr fundamentals on and at least learn the basics of block chain tech. welcome from a fellow noob 
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Well you’ve got it. Getting locked in a tribal mindset is the quickest way to lose money. You have to hold the middle ground always which is difficult because often trade decisions come from a place of tribal identity and rooting for a position (the one you identify with).  It’s team sports. 

I think this is a primary reason why even smart traders will lose. You have to willing to hold **no** position continuously, while simultaneously picking a position, *and* withstand change against your bets with a kind zen levity. It’s very very difficult to do. Only a few can tread this center line and win consistently. 
If you sell at 7k and expect to rebuy at 6k then it's enough to become a bear.
i keep telling the normies to just hodl but they don't listen and get rekt
That's correct.
Nah, people said "Thin air until 9.2k" after breaking the line yesterday. Everything is ok, 100X leverage with 100% of my stack.
3k is still possible.  Just because the market appears to be changing directions right now, doesn’t mean that this is a real reversal. When the market bounced up to 17k after the sell off from all time high, there were plenty of comments similar to yours about how silly it would be to think BTC could ever be below 8k again.  

It’s possible that there was a double bottom at 6/6.4k and this is the start of a bull market.  Very possible.  But it’s probably equally possible that this is yet another dead cat bounce on the way down to the real bottom, which  could  be on the realm of 3k.  

Don’t start choosing colors for your Lambo just yet 


I'm not a bear, but let us wait until the year is out before declaring anything as delusional. 
This could just ride support all the way down. Until this breaks out above some more supports, I wouldn't bank on it being a breakout.

*not really a bear, but I have some bear thoughts. like rawr.
I'll preface this with saying I don't think it's likely.  But imagine if we lost steam and drifted down to $7k?  How demoralizing would that be? And that's really not far; it's definitely possible.  A couple frustrated attempts to break back up, and you're looking at a strong bearish sentiment.  *That* could easily be a $3-4k scenario.

In the end, it doesn't matter what you think, whatever will happen will happen.  Some weight needs to be given to all possibilities.

That said, I think the most likely scenario is another bull run so that it's back-to-back like 2013.
It all depends if holders are ready to release their coins at such a low price, there's not much evidence they would, LT holders who bought sub 1k have seen it all and newcomers already sold. 

While I forecasted 4-5k it might never happen simply because everybody want these prices, 3k? Never.
3k is certainly possible. I mean, last time we were heading up we caved at 10k down to 6k.

By that reasoning at 9k we could easily go to 5k and so on and so on up and down until 3k.

Nobody can predict the future with any accuracy and those who claim to are usually shilling an ICO.

Hey hey hey...
I am long term bullish but am uneasy on the short and medium time frames. 

And [here is why.](https://imgur.com/a/16uH4UX) At a quick glance, what do you see.
Bottom of between $3k and $5k in 6-12 months as this recent $20k bull run dies down. Come at me, bro.
I'm short and don't see this move taking out our $9XXX high from last month. I'd need to see a daily or weekly higher low set in the $7k range in order to believe in that. 

I think there is a lot of weak hands that need to be flushed out before we go higher.  A ton of people that bought high or at last bull trap in the $10k-11k range are waiting to dump their bags if we get up there (if they aren't dumping them here).  IMO we can't move on until their coins move into stronger hands and that means a scary a price needs to be reached. $3k.... maybe not, but almost certainly lower that $6k.

Does anyone have a reasonable answer as to who would absorb the coins that would be dumped if we move up from here? The people selling them are the people we need to buy them, right?
I get the feeling that many ppl here were/are short-term bearish and long-term bullish, and now may switch to short+term bullish if we get past 12k or 16k or new ATH etc, but there're plenty of reasons to be long-term bearish as well. 

Don't see it getting mentioned on here, so just for the sake of it: crypto adaption has come and crypto is here to stay, but that doesn't have to include BTC exclusively. Half of the top 10 market cap coins are not mined. And several countries are coming out with their own government-issued national coins (Swedish e-Krona, Russian cryptorubbel, SK's S-coin, etc). A common story may be tighter regulation of non-government controlled coins, which would drive BTC price down long-term.
if we're under $6k in 3 months, we're going to $3k imo

but a lot could happen between now and then so it's silly to be incredibly sure of anything.

Keep in mind most people aren't like you, being 99.99% sure of their calls


Whats the point of this post? To mock bears or what? You are not any different from mocking bears with posts like this. 
Still gonna see 3k. This shit isn't over yet.
Yeah, I'm watching the same wedge
According to that we drop off once we get to 9300
Yep, but $9k got denied hard.
Slow down bitcoin, slow and steady wins the race. Let's just consolidate a bit here for a bit eh? 
Same but it needs to stay above 9.2K as that was support turned resistance
Volume has been going up last 3 days?
Why downvote someone for asking legimate questions and trying to learn?
Enter, suck up the losses buttercup
Watch for a pullback. Might be one tonight still.

Just wait on the correction, it will come. FOMO is strong at the moment and we just did wave 5 in a rising wedge. 
I'd wait until Monday. Looking at BFX orderbook right now, theres couple of support walls there, and then nothing but air. Scary stuff.
Im thinking the same contemplating......to buy in now or wait for 8600
Looks like it.  Now is the time for the bears to break it back down, but the sell pressure does not seem to be there.  I imagine that 8500-8600 will be defended by the whales like 6500 was a few days ago.  Then we will head back up to break 9.2.
8600 is the big trendline down on Bitfinex
I think 8300, the 50d MA.
What do you have the downtrend line at now if you don’t mind me asking?
I think alt season is over 
We really didnt test it on the way up, my bet is around 8450 if it goes that low 
Could be, but as BTC is moving together with ETH lately, if 600$ holds that could be it. Still in my long from 8790 and moved SL below the last wick, ready to take a small loss to re-enter lower rather than have to fomo if it shoots straight back up.
It's not out of question but unlikely tbh. Eos about to launch, eth making great progress etc I simply don't see btc bleeding on its own while the rest goes crazy. It might not grow as much because the capital needed to move it is enormous but it certainly will get its fair share. Also all the alts made a lower low compared to when btc was at 6k but btc didn't, that shows something.
'how fast this thing CAN go down..'

FTFY
>this time it's different
I'm sure an extra 10 million sellers are just waiting to sell having already been at this price point 3 times in the last 6 months and we're currently about to convince even the hairiest of bears that we're going back up.
I feel this daily discussion is a good indicator. Yesterday it closed on 1.7k posts, daily threads a week ago barely reached 1k.

Activity is definfitly higher during bullish sentiment (it's not the first time)
Not only that but futures are no longer in backwardation as of right now. That's a good sign.
[deleted]
Looks like it's either a graphical glitch (refresh the page), or there's just been no trades made during that time period.
your computer clock might be wrong? 
That happens often to me on finex's chart but not while I use it. It occurs usually when I have put my PC i sleep mode for 1 hour or more or disconnecting the PC from the internet for long periods of time. Could also just be no transactions, but that is clos to impossible on the 5min and up

Simply refresh the page, does the trick
Looks like its down. The api isn't responding either.
Wash trading.
Fortune favours the bolder.
In 2017 it went from 4k to 8k without stopping pretty much, then retraced to 5.3

Apllied today it could mean no stop before 13k then a pull back to 9 or something. 

"Sustainable" is a vague word in crypto world, it's sustainable until people think the price isn't attractive anymore and profit taking tip the balance, as long as people think it's going past 10k it's sustainable.
It's *exceedingly* concerning. Markets don't move like this without *some* kind of retrace of *at least* 1/3 of the move.

BCH is up almost 100% in 11 days and it's largest drawn down (only happened once I might add) is around 8%.

That's not suppose to be possible especially for an asset that is as large as it is. This is literally manipulation or 99.9% (or more) of the coin is hoarded and there's simply *nothing* on the market to obtain.
> There's no support lol

Watch 8500 become extremely strong support. 
imo if tether was as bad as people crack it up to be then they wouldnt have kept printing after their subpoena and audit. Its still run by real people and i dont think these people would risk running against the law.

If I'm wrong this will no-doubt be a Mt Gox-type event in the crypto community.
I agree it's absolutely batshit insane, but it's happening. 

Probably won't change until $12,000+ I suppose. 
Feels like its gonna blow upwards tomorrow, cus noone is expecting it
[deleted]
I need to learn more about futures but broadly understand it as locking in a future price and the benefactor pocketing the difference.  But if a future is set lower than current value, could that potentially mean there is an expectation that any rally will be temporary and a decline will resume before the future expires? 
if anything about the *Futures are made to control the Price* Thing is real, then you shouldnt give the Futures any weight in your decisions to Stop that.

 the Volume tradet is so tiny against the real market some People will get rekkt because they thought they could control the honeybadger... 
We didn't see a real break out or bull run, just bulltraps and bart movements , the pro's see this.
[removed]
The log resistance line that we broke through could now become support at about 8500. And the 50ma line is right below that at 8300. 
my general rule is you're allowed to fomo buy only on the first pump if it has high volume.  Other than that never fomo buy because the odds are against you.  Wait for the pull back instead.
We didnt get to 9.2
Whales trading their own assets is not manipulation in any sense of the word. Your purchasing power determines how much of the market you can move. Why is it acceptable for a small minnow to move the price by 0.01% and not for a whale to move it by 5%?
Why can't you have a decent amount of money and still be dumb money?
There's a lot of vote brigading going on, downvoting ones about whales/manipulation and upvoting moon posts. Think about that for a second
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
you cant double top in this market. double top is usually an indication of reversal at the end of a bull market, and btc is still trading at half of ath. 
Where are you looking? Where is the first top? 
[removed]
Anything above 9k is super important and is a major line to cross. Someone will explain why and it might not cross it this weekend. But the alts could really pump instead as they took a hit yesterday.

Or it could all drop 1k.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
You're fine. You only posted this a few minutes ago and it's already back at 8890 already.
Yes
If we knew we'd all be rich and probably not on this thread.
11k
Looking at EMAs on the 1W, 3D and 1D view, if this is actually a breakout, I don't see it coming back too far below $8300

Upside? Who the hell knows.

Low-leveraged bulls can wait it out (for years if necessary like I had to in '14, and have had to do over the past 4 months of dip-buying) - one mistimed short, and the damage is potentially unlimited
9.2-9.5.  I expect the BGDs to continue until the whales get people to FOMO back in and carry up the price on their own.
8K
Alts will follow man, they always do. Eventhough btc is king, and always will be, alts is where you make the real money.
I wouldn't say that exactly. If we go below 8.4 I'd say yes. This is the old log resistance that I hope has turned into support. And back up we'll go. 
We never left it if you look at the weekly chart.  Until we establish a high high and a higher low I say we are still in a downtrend.  We are looking good though as long as the log trend line holds as support.
Be careful with the stops, especially for your long. Longs shouldn't get stopped out above 8.1 and shorts shouldn't get stopped out below 9.3. This is how you burn money. 
[deleted]
What makes you so confident we cruise $500-$700 down to see Low 8k levels again 
it is much harder to squeeze longs than shorts, besides i dont see that many new ones. looks healthy   
it would be much more worrying if we suddenly got 3-4k+ extra longs in a day
long/short ratio is still very low compared to average
Just think of it like this. Adding to an underwater long gets easier over time because BTC gets cheaper but adding to an underwater short means spending more and more fiat to keep it alive. Longs are exponentially more difficult to squeeze barring a flash crash where there's no time to add margin. 
Believe it or not, shorts are still goddam high.

and longs below 30k are not something to be concerned, a lot of those are in the green anyway.
Oh nono, FOMOing in right before a big resistance point is not bound to be good for you. Always try and look at the potential retraction points before buying in. The 9200 resistance is bound to be hard to break from. I’d wait out the weekend if I were you, then see where we’re at. If we’ve cleared 9200 for good and you end up buying in, I’d suggest holding up until just under 11200, our next huge resistance point.
Now might be a good time to FOMO.

Edit - Looks like I was correct.
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
I think a lot of people are betting on a small retraction to gather up strength and test 9200 at this point. This kind of growth wasn’t sustainable, let alone with enough force to test that huge resistance.
Satoshi value gets slaughtered when BTC goes on a run, reference the last few months of 2017. I can't give an explanation as to why though.
Traders don’t hold on to their positions forever. They find a bottom, but in and sell whenever it reaches their target. And they sell into BTC, which is one of the reasons in starts to go up too. 

To add: people buy in alts almost exclusively to increase their btc stack. No one in their right mind is thinking that tron is the future of world currency. 
My theory is that it's trading bots (run by 'professional' investors) who price coins in fiat value. When bitcoin goes up, they assume shitcoin's fiat value didn't change much, but satoshi value down. And this creates confirmation bias for human traders. It wasn't like that 3-4 years ago.
Job postigs have very little to do with work or productivity

Most Crypto startups are an utter and complete mess
/u/cryptochecker
How quickly we forget. 
until it isnt. give it some Time. 
Quick dude dump your btc for alts while they are still up!
[removed]
One thing I have learned is diagonals in charting can be way too subjective and hence prone to biases of the chartist.  Horizontal lines are king and that is why my main TA strategy revolves around pivot points (support and resistance levels based on mean reversion).  I will only accept diagonals if they also and necessarily align with these pivot levels.
I can also draw a bearish triangle showing a failed breakout , it's meaningless. 
I can draw triangles too
You could draw that after any bubble pop.
One cant trade based on the orderbook, there might be hidden orders  or a ice berg layered orders so the depth might be higher than we can see, plus all the open longs and hodlers are potensial sellers so resistance is bigger than the orderbook makes us belive atm imo. But on the other hand it does give an impression of failing bear treng resistance, but it alone isnt a good indicator, if it even is a good indicator. Mostly orderbooks can be used to determine the liquidity of the market, not direction.
You are just an asshole not much we can do about that, sorry.
You just sound like a terrible person in general, sorry.

Having more money imo doesn't make you better relationships, it's fertilizer for more bad ones.
have fun getting robbed one day. it doesn't have to be people you've told, it just has to be someone those people told, and maybe someone further down the chain that realizes "if i just kick the shit out of him and his family i could probably get his private keys".

no amount of cryptographic security will protect you against violence, and eventual surrender of your private keys.
If your personality is being a dick, why would it change once you make money by sitting in front of your computer?
Maybe you aren't successful by your own standards (or don't have your own standards) so you're trying to prove to others that you're successful by theirs. 

Lol! Don't know why you're being downvoted. You're making progress just acknowledging the problem. 


What might help is to realize that a lot of the frequent posters here regularly bet/trade six figs, don't sell or cut losses for anything under 5figs. You're a frog in a well right now, much bigger world out there full of people who could make you, your GF and your mother their concubine at a flick. Imagining that might calm you down some 
Sounds like Bitcoin is ruining your life. Anyone retiring at 29 is a dork, doesn't matter how rich you are.
People really need to read up on how GDAX is a major instrument in moving from BitMeX to fiat.
>gib money pls 
I think someone dropped the cup and broke the handle. 
[removed]
[removed]
I am in the same boat to be honest. 
This dildo is much weaker then the last, it I think we will be in the 9k range for a while.

If 1k didn't get the engine running properly why would 500?
Do you think it will just go up forever? People take profits. Not me, I don't sell, but others do. 
8.6k has been tested. Now we are going to break 9k (no fomo)
It's coiling (low volume bull flag consolidation, short term oscillators are cooling off) for another attempt to breech 9k, there's no urgency to sell; dips are being bought up.  Bad idea to short but that never stopped anyone from shorting or longing when r/r is unfavorable anyways, so by all means. 
low lev short is a good move here imo... definitely would not open fresh longs up here other than high lev scalps 
How do you know they are using leverage ?

Donald, is that you?
[removed]
That pattern is omnipresent in ALL securities at one time frame or another.  Context is everything.  I can find one of these in Campbells Soup Company stock chart let alone in the same security.  No chart pattern in and of itself is unique, but all the TA used in tandem with market sentiment is what makes trading an art form and not an exact science.  That is what makes any two patterns 'different' even if they appear the same.  If it was as easy as the picture suggests then everyone would be rich.
Downvotes since this has been posted in 100 variations in the last week. And nothing new or original to add. In case you are wondering. 
It's ignored until it isn't, if we double top at 9k with a bearish div it's guaranteed to be bad.
We are also in a log trend channel that would be nice to stay in before we retest 9000 if we could bounce off that around 8600 that would be great.  Give us time to cool off and keep momentum with the bulls hopefully set a daily higher high tomorrow or so and get into a position to go for a weekly higher high.  Fingers crossed we could always dump again.
If that makes everyone more comfortable so be it, wouldn't read too much into it, rather fib levels that's what MMs use. The line from 6k to 6.5 has proven completely irrelevant for example.
Yes he has many times.
He makes money because he's more often right than he is wrong.
I have gotten burned a few times for following his trades blindly. Not because they were the wrong calls, but because I didn't always close or abandon the trades at the same times.

Right now I'm not following Chewy, he's still long from 8.1k I believe.
I wouldn't say my bullish confidence has collapsed. 

I'm just expecting a moderate pullback. And I'd like to get out of the way for now. 
I agree , I think it is suspicious of a bull trap, but if it gets to 12k, it’s no longer a bull trap IMO.  That would confirm a double bottom at 6/6.4k, and would be very bullish.  I would say the chances of that happening in the near future are slim to none.  
Agree with all this.  But if you’re willing to accept the real possibility of a $12k retest (which I’m positing here) than it would seem like an easy play. You gotta try and catch these thing before they happen to maximize return rather than waiting endlessly for confirmation.  I’m not saying we’re out of the bear cycle, but breaking the longer term downtrend should read as a huge buy signal even if it takes a week to manifest (RSI too high on many time frames to make this break a real run away in my mind)
Hahah ... well... this is the difficult part of trading I think ... we’ve had an 18 week bear cycle. The last downtrend lasted 45 days. It becomes easy to settle into a mode of thinking that expects similar results.  Good traders need to try and identify direction shifts and remain agnostic (very very difficult as we’re not really wired this way as humans).  

One key, and I think super fucking obvious, indicator for direction shift was breaking the log line... and I’m surprised to see so many bears still ringing the same bell.  I’m wondering if I’m missing something, hence the post. 
Nah. I didn’t. Look at the charts.  There was a ~30% price increase when first downtrend broke. Price leveled and then came down further. It didn’t walk the resistance down on a tightrope. 
Thanks for your comment. I tend to agree (and have bet thusly), but am looking for contrarian opinions. 
Legit concern. Alt pumping can signal a death rattle. But in fairness many dropped 90% or more from ATH. And the alt market is much more mature than 2012-2014
Thanks for your comment. Pairing intrinsic value with nominal price continues to be difficult for me (largely because this nascent market is propped up on speculation)

I will say that I do understand both philosophically, economically and technically (I’m a software dev by profession) the intrinsic value of BTC and also the metrics around adoption curves as I’ve worked on some big apps ... and know the vast majority die in the swamp .... BTC hasn’t and so I feel largely more confident than i did in 2013 because BTC has survived the most vulnerable stages of its incarnation. I think now is actually one of the most prudent times to invest. 

So anyways, how do we square this with price?  The hard question. 
Do you think it will happen?
As I understood it, miners used large scale (forward) contracts for hedging. They do it OTC or through other sources, not Bitmex.

Also if they did it through Bitmex futures, the open interest should be rising considerably, but it's not.
As best as I can tell, whales are literally the only ones buying enough to move the market any measurable amount.

Each push up is due to some alt jumping up some large amount. The problem is, most of those alts are up over 80% in the past 11 or so days. That's not realistic in the least (literally what happened back in December/January) and that will have to come back in at some point.

Once it does, the bigger alts don't need to go through BTC, they can go straight to cash and it should drag BTC back down with it.

When that happens, on the other hand, who fucking knows. Could be 5 minutes from now, could be 5 weeks from now. All I know is that if I made 2x in a *week* on an asset the size of Ripple or BCH, I'd be looking to sell and walk with my winnings.
Order book aside, ~8400 is a pretty thick (bumped against many times from each direction) horizontal support/resistance line with history going back almost 6 months.
OTC orders are private between very large buyers and sellers. It means the market has run out of very large sellers. 

OTC buying its done so you don't crash an illiqued market on your way out or moon it on your way in.
Something like that. There have been a bunch of rumors around that some very large buyers are looking to buy blocks of BTC and can't get them filled at current prices. If I was a broker I would start building positions now to fill these institutional orders at higher prices. The logical place to start doing that is exchanges.

The only thing that scares me right now is futures trading at a discount to spot. If the demand was REALLY there that's the logical trade.
Monday morning 0:00:00 UTC
it's only if the high volume is for 5 mins then dies out 10 seconds later...

high volume consistently all day is amazing but we haven't had that in months
I've been long BTC for 18 days, long ETH for 12 days and I have an alts portfolio that I've DCA'd into over the past five months. On all of the above, I've locked in some profits and added to various positions. I know that will probably sound like BS to some, but that's generally why I don't share how or what I trade.

Personally, I lean towards more short to mid-term trading instead of ultra short-term trading. TA helps me determine where the market is headed and what are the good entry/exit points. As of today, I've scaled back some of my BTC holdings as the market roared back to life this week and then some. It's natural to have a slight mean reversion to cool off.

If I had to pick one case, I'd likely say we let some air out of the market over the next 48 hours and follow the "Bull Case," but stay on the higher side of that range. That said, the market looks healthy and it's possible the "Uber Bull Case," fully plays out.

Sorry if that's convoluted.
Yes, I'm using log scale on all of the charts. The "four scenarios," chart might seem a bit messed up because I had to manually zoom in to get all the arrows visible.
Pretty much the same here, actually. I have a stop-buy above 9.2k. The double 12h / single 1d cloud breaks out at 9.1k.
[deleted]
All that volume came within a minute candle on bitfinex
wow and look at that  1.5k btc volume a couple of hours ago dropping us 400
People never complain when its manipulated to their benefit. 
This is the new "this is good for bitcoin" 
I'm pretty sure bitmex is a quality organisation that is doing what they can to scale. While all fiat exchanges had they're exponential user increase in oct-dec and took months to scale properly and adjust to the new demand, Bitmex had they're strongest user growth from Jan to now with everybody learning they can also short btc and are now going through the same thing.

Sure they've probably got all the money they need to get the scaling in place, but it still takes time to integrate new hardware and set up a new system. Man-hours is the thing that counts here and I'm pretty sure they'll come out with new upgrades soonish.

Doesn't help the fact that it's borderline unusable right now, but i wouldn't get my panties all up in a bunch about it and start throwing around blame just yet. Give em some time and try to work around it as much as possible.
I wouldn't say that, bitmex has very different products that are a lot more complex from an exchange perspective. Nonetheless they are doing close to 4 billion in volume a day \(head and shoulders above everyone else\).
A small bull move in a big bear trend . . so which way is the reversal?

lol
No stop loss - holding bags if it goes down
I am not going to sell if it goes back down, I am just going to hold - not going to day trade anymore. 9.7 is my sell
Deutscher?

I’m in Munich today if anyone wants to hang
Most alts WILL die, regulation or no regulation, but I don't think it's going to be a singular event. We're just going to see alts die in the coming months and years as they fail to come to fruition. Maybe when we reach a critical mass of failure and consumer confidence in alts shatter then we'll see all alts take a bigger hit. 
Which alts that existed in 2013/14 survived through the 2014-2016 bear market? All the ones I held at that time are either utterly worthless or defunct now.   The only survivors of that era I can remember are ETH, XMR, and XRP. 
> Didn’t you invest in bitcoin at one time when it was an even more stupid and wild and crazy idea and had almost no chance of succeeding?

But Bitcoin was hardly worth anything back then. I'd maybe invest in altcoins more if they'd be at 1/100th of current market caps. Right now practically all of them are horribly over-inflated because of Bitcoin's success, while coming nowhere even near Bitcoin's quality in engineering, ecosystem or principles. So that's a massive bubble right there.
You are forgetting the most important thing. Bitcoin was the first. XXXXCoin is the 739,639th. It's not special and it doesn't have a revolutionary new use case. Bitcoin is and did
I am BTC and trading noob, first time I even looked at the crypto market was in January this year. My opinions and statements are not based on emotions, they are based on facts and research. Just look at the every bubble graph in history and that is common sense for me.
Everyone wants to be part of the "next Ethereum". I think alot of this purchasing is desperate uninformed buying in the hopes to be on that ride. 
> Why use a blockchain

Immutable and redundant data, (potentially) 99.99% uptime and infinite scalability, (future) lower costs compared to centralized solutions, etc. The current state of most blockchain tech is quite garbage (cost/performance wise) compared to existing solutions, but time will (hopefully) change that.

I agree with you for the most part on XLM, used to agree on IOTA but they remind me of the garbage but massive potential tech from dotcom times (albeit I arrived to the scene after that bubble popped). If you like tech or are a developer check out Nebulas, it's got the LLVM under the hood and is written in Golang which is pretty awesome. Writing smart contracts is a breeze. Plus they meet deadlines unlike 90% of the crypto space. I'm not saying to buy any, but just checking out their source code provides a lot of insight into blockchain development.
There are alot of alts out there with a better usercase then btc, thats just a fact! Bitcoin isn't the holy grail....far from it. 
Sorry you listed some good alts there imo (i agree with you on some of them). What alts do you think aren't worthless?
This post is the most ridiculous run\-down of alt projects. You are clearly a btc maximalist if this is your line of thinking. "Nano, Neo, DAG coins... do people really think this is the future" LMAO. This is just confirmation bias thinking. How blind. "IOTA... riddled with holes and their client implementation is a joke." This is just utterly false, I don't even know how to respond to it. You are either uninformed or brainwashed. This fanaticism will keep you from seeing the rug get pulled out from under you some day.
Because thankfully you're not the judge that can asses all alts and not even the top 20 of CMC because you think your 5 years studying makes you the best engineer in the world.

Also you probably can't follow up on everything which is why I can see here bullshit from 1 year ago for some alts (like lolol xrptrash or IOTA holes and shit.) Same speech, you just didn't update yourself on what's going on except what Reddit tells you :)
I just get some to dump when I think the alt market is over and to get more BTC for 99% of them.   There are a small amount I will keep long-term because they're interesting with great teams but I have gotten over the idealistic part of me that won't touch the shitty ones just to join in on the pure speculation party and gain more btc. 
Note to moderator: I'm not shilling but we are having a small alt discussion here.

Check out NEM.  Probably the best developed blockchain and ETHs most developed direct competitor with major upgrades coming very soon. They have a full API so no Solidity programming.
True and very bearish, prepare for downvotes.
I'm so high. 
https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8bwesq/daily_discussion_friday_april_13_2018/dxbjjz3/

Just give up bro. 
dude the amount of spot buys at this level is nutty, very bullish. margin is barely moving and yet we've estabilished support  and going slowly up. bullish  
i was not expecting this but i think if u short this ur gonna have a bad time. 
I see both.
you're calling bitmex a scam? did you live under a rock or something?
[deleted]
and it is very important to mention that bitmex IS NOT a bitcoin exchange.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
No, just passing some random noise using a distribution to the hour the daily candle takes in . So lets say there is a 50% possibilities the difference is 1h, 25% is 2, and so on. 
That hit 27 minutes ago on bitmex.
nah, i'm in on a close in the 1d cloud which is currently at 9.2k
So I'm not a fool with my limited knowledge and feeling like the best case scenario would be to just wait patiently, buy during the downturns, and watch my equity grow?
Okay, I get about a third of this. Thank you for pushing me in the right direction. I'll be doing my own research to understand the latter part of your reply. THANK YOU!
Definitely working on that - thank you!
Collective wisdom or collective insanity? I think I get this. The numbers and graphs go way over my head but I'm starting to understand it. Thank you!
Wise words.  The price will go up and the price will go down.  Sunrise Sunset.
My quick reaction to this if you’re interested: Watch the daily RSI for these macro moves. Then pair them with your short term strategies. Don’t lean too heavily on the tone of a forum like this for short term trades as sentiment is generally a lagging indicator. 
[deleted]
My reason for asking was that I though it entirely possible that we break the log resistance from the ATH, but could still hug that line down since it would be descending support.  But, if this rising trendline becomes reliable support, that would be encouraging evidence for this being an actual reversal.
only 100%?
Contrarian ≠ Delusional.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
a chance for a threepeat
> A common story may be tighter regulation of non-government controlled coins, which would drive BTC price down long-term.

Or government regulation could cause price to further increase, because it's a signal that governments won't fight Bitcoin or make it illegal.
To glean insight from contrarians.
We will sure see 3/4K range around summer , there is no break out or bull run it's all fake.
hard u mean we tracedback 200 bucks after having a 1500 bucks run?
good point, looking at the 6h charts the volume is still more or less the same a part of the small spike from the denied 9k.
[deleted]
It's the downvote bot. I kid you not.

Watch this:

!downvoteme 4 times
whether or not there will be correction, many thanks for the comment :)
Which level of correction would you anticipate?
Just start scaling in if you believe we'll be seeing higher lows and higher highs.
It’s almost 8.6k now. Do we know where’s the next support 8.6 or 8.5?
Yeah.. never easy. I don’t expect it to go down below 8.5k before re-attempting 9k again as that will be a much larger retrace than I expect right now. Btw it has since bounced $50 and back above 8.7k now.  Grrrr....
That’s not so bad, I might as well hold :P Thanks!
8450 or 8500ish, but https://twitter.com/Crypto_Ed_NL/status/987966457215676416?s=19 ...
> I think alt season is over 

Oh my sweet summer child
Maybe not for the likes of eth, ltc.
I think it's only just beginning, a lot of projects plan releases soon 
yeah i read my comment again and though the same. If it goes down it will go fast.
I mean on terms of retracing dumps it *is* different. Haha. I don't believe in sustained long term upwards movement just yet but I don't think it's going to dump as obviously or quickly as last time. Mainly based on sentiment, even if it feels like whales are controlling this. 

Could totally be wrong, but it definitely *feels* different so far. The complete lack of selling is very odd 
Maybe im wrong and we go straight to 10-15k, but people, myself included are careful, im not saying we go back to 6k, but as fast as we rise 1k we can go down. And all those coins that where bought on the way up will be sold sooner or later.
FWIW, as a European user, Bitstamp hasn't let me down since I started using them in 2013. 
Kraken is ultimate manipulative garbage and I can't wait to move to another exchange 
Yeah, but dumpening in similar fashion is perfectly healthy. /s What goes up must go down, and the opposite.
[deleted]
Wasn't the subpoena from the US and so they just dropped US users?

Then they didn't have to deal with US regulators and courts. I'm not even sure if they had to comply with the subpoena at that point. Let me know if you have sourced proof that they still complied with it.
Sep is over spot, just barely. I bet there would be a nice ~$50 premium if we held over 9200. 
Then why is it going up as much as it is?
Yes, that's been my point. Everyone is saying this is now a bull rally (especially cause the log line was broken) but futures still have a negative premium which indicates an expectation of the price going lower.

If they believed it would keep going higher, they should be buying futures as futures are selling at a discount to the spot and collect the free time premium.

But since there's a negative premium, which indicates negative outlook, why are we still going up? The futures are in contradiction to the movement of the spot as well as the sentiment everyone is calling.

So something is very wrong here. There's free money lying on the table and nobody's taking it. That's not suppose to be possible.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
On bitmex futures prices are decided strictly by supply and demand. If there is a negative premium it just means more people are wanting to short than to long at the current spot price . Of course there is still the mark price of the future on bitmex that shows a negative premium but I believe that's only used for liquidation purposes
he means futures on mex, not CME
This is a low effort post.
A fool and his/her money are easily parted.
Thank you for sharing this hilarious subreddit lmao 
Either that or big money...

FWIW, nothing in post is written in the first person. Or did you not mean to be offensive?
There was a double top at 11,5 and smaller double top fractals all the way down. 
9k 

On the 1d candles. After the double top from 11,5 and the bounce off 7,3 which took us to 9,2. 

Edit: that post was mostly a question. 
This probably isn’t the right sub for you then. 

This sub is for TA and trading strategies, FYI. 
> Someone will explain why and it might not cross it this weekend.

I have no reason to believe that we will not cross 9,100 this weekend and start next week with a road to 10,000.
Hmmmm did it not cross the big important bear line?
I didn't say what do you 'know' is going to happen, I was just asking for an educated guess. Apologies if that wasn't clear. 
Agreed, r/r for shorts is terrible right now, best objective seems to be to time your long as best as possible to maximise profit and then revaluate after the next leg up. 
sorry but what is a BGD? seen it a few times but can't figure it out
Good point thank you 
Thanks for advice 
A consorted group of “whales” has been orchestrating these BGD ever since $6800 & propping the price up, eventually they are going to sell off....this does not seem organic, does it?
We are at 8900 right now. What are you talking about? Even 8900 to 9200 would be a great trade. But that's completely beside the point here, looking at the last 5 days. 
But surely now is a good time to fomo

edit// OH NOES
Or not. ;)
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
Should we get to 10k I'll sell it all and go away for a few days because that's going to be ugly.
I'm searching for that explanation, when BTC goes down people jump to BTC--->Tether. That makes sense. But the reverse? not so
BTC goes up when fiat/tether/stablecoin is used to buy it, right? You don't pay Tron to buy BTC. They can simply wait out the BTC rise in their alt positions, not taking profits/selling prematurely just because BTC is going up. I still don't see the logic in that.

Edit: "people buy in alts almost exclusively to increase their btc stack" a very wrong statement IMO. Alts are much more popular among new money (post 2017)
That may be true for Tron, but not for coins like ETH, BCH and even XMR. 
Yes, bot trading is the culprit but the logic of that jerk that programmed the bots in the first place is still flawed. If BTC fiat value goes up, so will that of the alts because they're valuated based on satoshi value, not fiat value. The whole market is a huge extension of BTC. 

Of course this provides trading opportunities that leads to higher satoshi value (alts bleed when BTC goes up/down, providing better re-entry positions), maybe it's just market manipulation? This one makes sense but needs a tinfoil hat.
Of [u/gr8ful4](https://www.reddit.com/u/gr8ful4)'s last **17** posts and **379** comments, I found **17** posts and **329** comments in cryptocurrency-related subreddits. Average sentiment (in the interval -1 to +1, with -1 **most negative** and +1 **most positive**) and karma counts are shown for each subreddit:

Subreddit|No. of posts|Avg. post sentiment|Total post karma|No. of comments|Avg. comment sentiment|Total comment karma
:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--
r/BitcoinMarkets|0|0.0|0|67|0.07|184
r/Bitcoin|3|0.0|581|45|0.14|213
r/ethereum|1|0.0|3|8|0.04|109
r/ethtrader|2|0.0|210|11|0.1|29
r/btc|11|0.15|678|176|0.12|1259
r/Monero|0|0.0|0|22|0.12|168

***

^(Bleep, bloop, I'm a bot trying to help inform cryptocurrency discussion on Reddit.) ^| [^About](https://www.reddit.com/user/cryptochecker/comments/7q3jum/faq_about_ucryptochecker/) ^| [^Feedback](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=jamcowl&subject=cryptochecker%20bot) 
[deleted]
Teach me master how to use PP on TV
Thanks dude! I’ll keep that in mind.
shittt.. i should really watch out for those fists coming through my computer screen.

I don't talk to people like that irl man, just on reddit. but i still need to stop that shit
So what you are saying is I can’t change?
ahhh shit. yea you are right. their profits on a decent day is like my entire quarter of sweating bullets and worrying. I definitely will calm down thinking of that. Thanks for this dude!
[deleted]
....yeah man, not having to work anymore makes you such a fool...
no i'm not retired I just talk hella smack because of the gains. Also being single with no kids helps a lot with the lack of things to spend money on
dick move bro. 

I mean this one : https://www.tradingview.com/x/mT2AKBRs/

Don't give it any value.
Our boat will sail through the thick and thin, the day and nights, the storms and the calms, we will continue sailing. 

Well come aboard my friend.
> I think we will be in the 9k range for a while.

There is some probability of it, like we swinged in the 8K range, but who knows.

> If 1k didn't get the engine running properly why would 500?

Don't you think that the engines have been running at mach 1 since  6,800? 
I'm just a bit worried that when there are no shorts left and this goes down, who's gonna make it bounce?
Why do you think that ?


Sick gains bro.  No fomo
When isn't a low leverage short an appropriate move if not in the middle of a handle/consolidation pattern of a bull flag! /s -- these shorts are what fuel the breakout from the consolidation.  It's money thrown away IMO.  
.. traders here described it as “the bots have become more aggressive.”
[removed]
I feel like this is becoming the new "bubble chart" overlay.
Then it wouldn't be a divergence. 
> rather fib levels that's what MMs use

source?
Ah okay. Seems to be a household name around here, thought I’d see what the fuss is about. Thanks :)
When the 2014 ATH log resistance broke, btc followed it down for another 7 months. Likely wont be as long this time if it did happen though.
Yeah, futures below swaps still tells me there's lots of people who haven't recognized the trend may have reversed either temporarily or for the long term. It's very tempting to just long futs knowing a push past $10-11k will mean they blow up to a 3-4% premium 

I'm finally more comfortable longing  now. It's a small long, just unhedged stack, but I'm just not comfortable trying to short this as much anymore. I might try at $9.2-9.3 though lol 
Ah I see your point. 
[deleted]
I'd still wait for morning before panicking sometimes arbitrage does fail
Miners enter forwards with utilities companies and exchanges. They don’t need futures because they can just agree on a price and delivery is usually done in multiple payouts every time they mine a block
Yeah. I agree. I bought a lot of ADA from 0.20 down to 0.12 and have considered selling off. 

This territory is difficult because it’s flirting with a recovery but there are certain signals (those you’ve outlined) that make me still skeptical. 

I’m longing BTC right now but will be out of trade if this reverses. Will wait the months it takes to buy back into a few more capitulation events. 

The one thing that’s sticking with me however, that you may want to comment on is that general crypto awareness is massively different than the last cycle and I think there are still many early adopters eager to catch the next wave which might mean an abbreviated recovery. 

Anecdotally I get regularly recruiting emails asking me to work on block chain tech (still as of today) and so the emerging industry around this is real as these startups (mostly in my case) have to raised capital to hire engineers.  This engenders some level of confidence. 

In some ways it feels the cat is out of the bag. 
Ta!
TY. Enjoy reading your posts, but I especially appreciate if it's accompanied by someone's own positions.

And people will call BS over anything, wouldn't let that hold you back for sharing your (BTC) trades, but of course you have to do what feels right for you.
Why would you  tell people about a profitable strategy? The more people that know about it, the quicker it disappears 
How's it working for you today?
What is the exact time you referring to? i'm not seeing this on Bitfinex couple hours ago. Cheers!
agreed. bulls yell manip when it drops amd natural gwoth when it rises . bears yell manip when it rises but natural dump when it drops
So are you saying that this was not manipulated?
We have broke log resist, EW in all scales points to at the very least a big raise before going down again, we have a clear A&E bottom. Plus it would be giving to much importance for something that only matters for a single day. 
Na man, Belgian. I'm used to some stronger stuff, but pretty hungover rn :-/
Darkcoin (dash), Vertcoin, Dogecoin and Reddcoin all survived I guess you can say that I remember off the top of my head but ya most died off. 
So ETH is no where near BTC in quality principles or engineering?  Are you serious?  How about NEM which is developed to a level beyond them all technically but is completely under priced?
Nebulas is on my list of quick movers, yes
Then give me a use case. And I will show you how to do it on Bitcoin
>There are alot of alts out there with a better usercase then btc, thats just a fact!

Keep repeating it to yourself and maybe it'll come true.
Right now: Ethereum, but I hve my gripes with it. Monero

In the future: Probably Cardano, Lumens if they actually have a use case. 
All us veterans are immune to hype arguments like this. You don't have any counterargument, you just assert that, no really, alts are actually good. 

No alt is doing anything that bitcoin can't do. The only alt that is 1% interesting to me is Monero for ring sigs. And it's not "pulling the rug out from under us", ring sigs are a function that bitcoin deliberately didn't incorporate because of the size cost.

If something comes along with an innovation bitcoin wants, bitcoin will just adopt that innovation. It's not hard to see alts have much less long term value than btc.
Then give me an argument as to why one of these coins has a real use case and I will show you how to do it on Bitcoin
To be fair IOTA is pure shit, wallet wise at least and XRP is pure trash crypto wise but ya I'll trade the shitcoins too. 
Please enlighten me what has occurred over the past 6 months in IOTA or XRP.

Or any alt outside ETH for that matter. I’m actually interested to learn what has happened while I was listening to reddit

I just flipped through the github of IOTA and what I’m seeing are 3-4 commits every 3 days on average with meh amount of content. 

Contrary to popular belief, I get my information from guthub, and I test out issues on some of the alts, and I have a couple somnets running locally or on aws for the kicks.

I used to mine, but it’s not worth it anymore imo
Yeah, NEM is pretty great, but ETH still has the network effect imo 
>I'm so high. 

Buy low, get high. 
LOL why do people even try to predict the price.
We will see new lows soon , you cant be always 100% accurate.
Of course you see spot buys on Bitfinex ,  they can print unlimited tethers and still hold around 250 million usdt.
I can see dead bears... They are talking to me...
It’s pretty liquid but things can get a little crazy on squeezes when there’s a bunch of big liquis. Overall, I would recommend mex. One thing I really like about their site is that withdrawals are done once a day by hand so in the event that your account was conprimised your funds can not be transferred right away. 
[deleted]
Stay away if you can't handle a position being open and not being able to do anything about it at all when shit hits the fan with some slightly heavier volume. UI often then keeps disconnecting and you will be stuck unable to do anything until quite a bit of the action as finished 
Could be interesting, good luck!
Thank you sir. The graph was real blurry for some reason. Couldnt see it.
Yeah. DCA. Also during upturns.
Benjamin grahams intelligent investor is a great book to read if your serious about investing your money.  You'll want the most recent publication as the material is dry as hell, but the more modern case studies makes it bearable.  
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
You got it. It’s a fun challenge if you can navigate it. It takes a confluence of skills - both cerebral and instinctual. Personally I still feel very new.  Even if you have the temperament, it takes lots of practice.  

I used to hate the “HODL” mentality but realizing its best for 99% of traders. Most would benefit from putting fiat into a crypto index and let it just all happen. This space just seems so primed for massive growth in the next 5 years. 
I never sold, just caught the falling knife at $14k, $12k, $10k, $8k, and $6k

Have had to average down to get my position down to $9085 over the past 4 months
Of course everyone should sell the top and buy the bottom. That's not a lesson but hindsight is 20/20 shittalk. Especially "normies" i would never ever advice to try to time the market. 
yeah but they don't know how to time the market
The bank is closed, can't borrow 10 millions to go full brutality, sadly :(
Uh, not thinking we're going to $3k is absolutely not contrarian. Otherwise there would be no one buying.
this dude gets it
Then we have 16+ months of downward pressure til we bottom between 2k-4k
I am not sure what timeframe you are looking at, but single drop of >$400 is something.

I am not saying we will continue NYE bear run, or that this bull run is over, it's just $1500 in 10 days is unsustainable rise at this period.

I'd rather have secure bottom, than uncertain bull FOMO run.
lol
Seriously? WTF?
lol
!downvoteme 200 times
7.5-7.8k ideal buy zone and sets us up for inverse head and shoulder with the target being right at the next major resistance if it plays out... just below 12k 
Sounds like the right way of doing it.. if only I am disciplined enough!!
I think there is a slight probability that it could go down even below $8,500, as sellers are eating up the buy orders until they can while the buy pressure is not that high during these hours. From seller's point of view, the 300+ BTC buy wall on Finex @ $8,500 is very contemplating. 

Some sold at the right time, some will end up selling at wrong time. Either one group of them will benefit from it when this dip reaches it bottom, which could be right below $,8,500, perhaps between $8,450 - $8,500 before it bounces back hard to retest 9K resistance with much more momentum.

Above is just a hypothesis based on my understanding of the market today. Please be fully responsible for your own actions. Thanks. :)
I hope I’m wrong but there’s never been a significant alt season before a large btc run up. This would be the first time. I think this is more similar to what we saw in August 2017 than December 2017. 
Fomo is needed both ways, until 7800 breaks i don't see bulls sweating much, except over leveradged ones 
>Could totally be wrong, but it definitely feels different so far. The complete lack of selling is very odd

That's the feeling someone or the market wants you to have... guess what happens next
Did you ever think that maybe just maybe there are people that buy for the long term and that they arent trading... These people are DCA and a 1k drop wont make them sell all their coins...
10k sold in an hour, we moved <$200.  This is no longer a bear market.  Dips/corrections will be bought until that changes. 
+1 for Bitstamp
I'm not lying to stick up for tether lol I couldn't give two shits. 

I don't think they can bluff their way out of a subpoena though, but we don't know the outcome of that so it's too early to say?

Please take your tinfoil hat off.
\> There was never an audit done despite their promises.

This is all speculation, they never made an audit publicly available. Do you think poloniex/bittrex/binance/kraken would all be to dumb to see what everyone on reddit has been screaming for months? OR do you think they have different information \(such as an audit\). Note that I am also speculating, just like you.

*But yes, they did promise a public audit which they never did.*
I have exactly the same thoughts. The worst thing is that tether may cause a terrible crash of the whole crypto market, it's probably just a matter of time. Although i really want to believe they they will put enough money in their bank account before someone finds out how little they have and how much air we've been buying from them.

Should we do something about it before it's too late?
I'm not sure what's happened with the subpoena. I guess its not just an easy process and will be dragged out for a while.
It's barely gone up, we aren't even at 50% of ATH. If/when we are going sideways/up for weeks and holding 10k, maybe then they will slowly start to regain premium. They won't have that 5-8% premium like they did during a lot of 2017 unless we start a new bubble and make new ATH
[deleted]
I see it and call for a triple bottom at 7k before a reversal.
The most successful trading strategies don’t rely in TA.
Yes, but there's a lot of lines. Lots.

9k, 9.2, 9500, 9800, 10k especially.
Sorry I didn't mean to sound like a dick. 

Spend some more time lurking here and you'll see even the most experienced don't really have much idea about whats going to happen next. These past few weeks/month have been especially uncertain.
I'll also say another thing...

If this ISN'T a breakout, I'm too scared to look at where support levels may be :s

The benefits of being a low-leveraged long I suppose - just keep throwing good money after bad every week in hopes of a recovery in a year or two :p
Big Green Dildo. Reference to big Green candles that shoot the price up
I'm not fully bullish yet, but your statement literally also means 'This is a sucker's rally' lol
What does feel organic with Bitcoin? It makes sense that after tax day money is flowing back into the market
I'm not sure you realize how much money was waiting on the sideline and FOMO'ed in after 8k, everything is always a whale conspiracy lol, or a news event, most the time the market is just being the market kids, learn up on market cycles. 
I suppose we share different views then. I don’t personally think the risk/reward ratio for that trade is worth it at current the standing (especially if using leverage).
[removed]
If you want to get rekt in the long term he means
Why do you think so? There doesn’t seem to be much resistance at 10k. Psychological barrier?
Yes when you trade tron for btc then the BTC/tron pair goes up, when you trade usd for btc then the BTC/USD pair goes up. Got confused about what op was referring to, too early in the morning I guess. 

Alts are popular because they are easy to pump. It’s a circlejerk. They are also popular because new money thinks that 0.85$ ripple is going to 20k like btc. Every single person I know who bought alts in 2017 did it because: a) they are much ‘cheaper’ than btc b) they showed 500% gains in the past month. 

Not every alt is useless obviously but come on. 
>  If BTC fiat value goes up, so will that of the alts because they're valuated based on satoshi value, not fiat value.

If USD goes up, then the price of gold bars will also go up because they are usually traded in dollars.

That doesn't make any sense. The price of an asset is based on the value of the asset (i.e. raw gold bars), not the value of the things it happens to be traded against (i.e. dollars).

Maybe there is a correlation between BTC and alt price movements, but that correlation doesn't exist just because of the available trading pairs.
good bot
Bitcoin maximalists are mostly pre-2017 circle jerks for whom BTC made a fortune. You see the same mentality in every coin with such parabolic rise (e.g. ether, neo). They can't fathom that one day their precious coin may lose value to competition and are blind to technical limitations. Well, this is a zero sum game, value must flow to other projects from somewhere. 
You'd be surprised at how much work a man who has skills and really want to punch you IRL can do to find you. Be careful man.
Yes you can, but not by asking "how" on reddit. sounds more like keeping the same problem here by bragging even though you might not want to.
Reflect on yourself, you apparently know the problem. Shut your mouth before saying something stupid and be nice to other people, there is no magical solution
Haha yeah bro! Your first wipeout will also help with the humbling. 

This whole trading thing is as much about learning about yourself, as it is about reading charts. You're making progress on both fronts already👍
Choosing not to work in the prime of your life will make you miserable, ruin your relationships, stunt your development, and probably give you cancer.
Just playing. 

No reason to get hostile 
Nah barts are a stalling engine the volume is low
No one gave a fuck about shorts in 2017 and all it did was go up. I still could care less about it. 
Because if your bro gives you a brojob and you say no homo after, its not gay.

If you say no fomo after buying in it stops it from being fomo
We need to test it again imo. We tried failed now we gonna try again. But no one knows
Ok moon boi. I am extremely doubtful that we blast right through this strong resistance around 9k without a retrace. 
Seriously. Valid discussion, but just posting it is annoying. 
Chewy is awesome no doubt but only human and his explaintions are golden here. We love him no doubt.
yup... and when the first log resistance broke in 2014, price rose precipitously before plateauing and then resuming down ...  I'm not asking about the end of the bear market, just the sentiment that this is a fakeout and we should expect lower lows in the short term.  

What do you think?
Thanks for your comment. Out of curiosity, what do you see as top of this run and at what price do you expect it to bottom out?
Except that if bitcoin crashes all blocks they mine are now worth a lot less. Electricity/rental is paid in fiat.
> They don’t need futures because they can just agree on a price and delivery is usually done in multiple payouts every time they mone a block

That's what a forward contract is.
Venture capital is pretty easy to get these days regardless of the merit of your idea.

The problem is coming back to putting the cart before the horse. I just don't know anybody that is looking to pay for stuff with crypto. Look at it from this perspective, who is going to sell crypto if it keeps skyrocketing? What company is going to offer for you to get paid in crypto? Yes there are some but they're extremely rare and extremely tiny.

Most people have to pay bills and other obligations but if they're paid in crypto, who is going to let it go to pay for their stuff? It's worth more to hold onto it and borrow against it. But then you'll get a sell off and anyone that does that, ends up losing hard.

So crypto makes for an extremely shitty currency because the price isn't stable enough to be useful as a currency. Therefore instead of a currency, people are simply hoarding it and we're ending up being exactly where we are now. With whales controlling over 95% of the market, manipulation being extremely easy (and profitable), and there being little to no liquidity.
Fair enough. I will try to be a little more transparent about when I'm entering into/stepping back from the market. Thanks for the great discourse.
15min time frame. candle of 1.5k btc sell
No, just see it about 10 times a day in the daily. It's gonna become a meme soon. Everything is good for bitcoin and everything is manipulated 
Heh, how could I forget Doge. 
DNMS. XMR. Checkmate
Decentralised computing network capable of CGI rendering? 
U can't really use that as an argument, ex Ethereum, smart contracts, this can be implemented in the future in btc ... But that's not the case right now .. 
So i would say Ethereum has a better usercase then BTC.

It's weird that i don't get downvoted on a Bitcoin reddit page, right ?

Fair. I'm not trying to be all anti-bitcoin here, but im interested in why you think something like Nano wouldn't be the future. Ive been looking into it recently and tbh it looks pretty damn good (zero fees, near-instant tx), albeit it hasnt had nearly the amount of stress-testing and use as bitcoin has so its still very uncertain whether it can fulfil its role.
> If something comes along with an innovation bitcoin wants, bitcoin will just adopt that innovation. 

Is this actually true? Can BTC be infinitely upgraded? And is it infinitely malleable?  I'm seeing coins dedicated to verification, hardware / software communication, advertising, digital storage, privacy, etc. I can't see BTC being able to do all these things. And some of these things aren't necessarily of monetary value (eg. IOTA), which BTC most definitely is.

It also seems that certain existing institutions (software companies, hardware companies, banks, governments, etc.) will want to use the tech, but want total or partial control over it. This would necessitate alternatives, no?

You already admit that Monero has a use case that makes it valueable separate from BTC. This is hardly the only example I can think of where BTC would be insufficient.

I think you're being far to myopic in your view here, and assuming BTC can do all things for every use. To answer my own questions "is this actually true...is it infinitely malleable"...no it's not true. You are wrong. There will many successful projects over the next 5-10 years, with some overlap and some with 100% specialization. It doesn't mean they will all be as financially valuable, but hopefully investors are aware that not all of these coins / projects are built to make money...or to be used for financial purposes.
I didn't form a counter\-argument because, as I said, I had no idea what to say to that. The OP them self never makes claims against alt tech. They just say "lol yeah right." I can talk all day about how IOTA has a superior system, but I'm not going to spontaneously write an essay here about it. All I really need to bring up is the scalability argument, which I did in my reply to OP. Of course Monero tech wouldn't pull the rug out from bitcoin. It's a fork for god sakes. It's not really anything new. 

Last, " If something comes along with an innovation bitcoin wants, bitcoin will just adopt that innovation. " No. Lets say DAG's prove to be better. You can't just fork into a DAG. And lets say NEO ends up better. You couldn't just fork into NEO software either because it's a BFT mechanism, even though they are both blockchain. Don't act like an immutable ledger's tech can be mutable. There are strict limitations to BTC and you will realize that as time goes on.
Bitcoin doesn't (and probably won't) aim to do anything but a P2P decentralised payment system, which is fine but alts are going for a different goal here.

I like your input on this sub alot but i do agree with the above reply.
Lets talk IOTA. Internet of Things. IOTA will be the backbone for M2M payments as well as data/payment streams. Iota can scale for billions of devices. Bitcoin cannot. Bitcoin is not capable of being a P2P currency and will likely stay as a store of value once alts get fiat pairings.
That's the whole point of the new wallet project which isn't even yet in Beta so that has clearly been considered and yes the current wallet is pure trash. But they didn't brag about having a finished working product environment; which is the case for most alts even though there is nothing behind them

For XRP there are starts of real use case of the coin (not the Ripple protocol) in Japan which shows it's going in the right direction too.
Not yet.  But I think that will change soon when developers start picking it over ETH.  XEM/USDT pairing on Binance would go a long way as well, maybe soon.  I actually consider it a bellwether in this market - a barometer for how much the whole space is still based on complete hype and P&D.  Having TRON, EOS and Cardano ahead in MC right now is more than insulting and reflects poorly on the whole space imho.
You can only make bullish price predictions, right.
more like you can't always be 100% wrong.
Yo dude, I know you are getting downvoted heavily but stop deleting your comments, I’m already having trouble remembering people in this group.
>Of course you see spot buys on Bitfinex ,  they can print unlimited tethers and still hold around 250 million usdt.


edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
The permabulls on this sub will regret tomorrow when they got bulltrapped.
It's not an exchange though. Only Bitcoin in and out. 
If you’re on mobile, that’s apparently a new “feature” of imgur. You need to open it in app to view the full-res image. If not, ignore my comment :P
You guys make me smarter - THANK YOU!
I’ll look into this! My money either sits in a checking account doing nothing or sits in multiple accounts (hopefully) gaining equity. I see no other viable alternative than to share it with others for mutual benefit. I appreciate the feedback!
Haha! For reals, I don't understand half of this stuff but you're describing my reaction to a T! It gives me hope!
[deleted]
i usually trade based on daily timeframe.sure but it doesnt mean 9k was rejected hard.  
Ok - makes sense. It would take about a week to pan out.
Peoples greed will see to that. It's limitless.
mmm I held thru all of the run ups since $11.7k initially got rejected and none of them "felt" like this. 

Of course they *want* us to feel like this. The trick is getting out before they dump on us. 

I think it's possible it gets much higher before continuing downwards again. This isn't a simple retrace of a dump, it's a 37% rise so far.

If you look at 2014 it's wild how similar it's been. Upon touching $9.2-9.3 we'll go back to $7.8 for a while then dildo up to $11k again. 

the dates are almost even the same (both right before April 15th, last tax day)

Either bubbles play out very similarly or there is a market maker who's keen on 2014 charts lmao 

Anyway, sure there's a chance it turns around right here but I think there's very possibly still room upwards left before turning around. 
[deleted]
Do you know how much profit bitfinex would make yearly?
It's up more than anything else in my portfolio in any time period over six months, and I've had some big winners. 

And we're up over 30 percent in the past two weeks and more like 40 since the 5.9 K bottom. I'd say that's substantially good.  

Unless you're right at an ATH, you can always find a place from which to draw your line that it goes in a downward direction. 
Thank you for an informed response... some of the comments here are so low effort it's frustrating as someone who is trying to learn more and ain't practicing reading minds.  I'm not a trader but would like to understand how traders are thinking
If people aren't as bullish, then why are they selling swaps and not coins?
No, ***the*** bear line, ath and the last two spikes on a log scale
Next BGD launches in 5 hours... 
If this was "lots of normies" it would be creeping up and volume would be really high.

But that's not what is happening. It's one large jump that lasts 5 minutes then volume vanishes again and the price goes sideways with less than 1% of volatility for 5-10 hours before the next large jump.

That's not small people, those are whales.
Lol, did you miss 4-5 huge green dildos pushing the price $300-$500? Thats whales. 
I can't see it dropping any further locally, but trade safe everyone.
I agree, but for different reasons. Only gone up recently, r/r SHOULD be point towards shorting here. 
I know 95% of alts are useless, especially that most of them want to be a form of currency which is oversaturated role to fill when we have BTC, LTC and XMR. 

But you know, much diverse flavors in the alts, better marketing, a dash of nationalism (korean ethereum, chinese ethereum etc) and a whole lot of partnership with familiar names (fujitso, BMW, VW, Alibaba, IMB etc) makes alts much more appealing. Adding to that their potential to go up much higher. People say they missed BTC/ETH, they're trying to catch the next one. 
Cuz we heard the "flippening" for years and years and most people understand Bitcoin is the bluechip of crypto that most people want to have.   Most people aquire alts to get Bitcoin, what's traded in the biggest futures markets right now? Bitcoin, what's talked about most of crypto? Bitcoin, what has been tested more than any other coin? Ya you get it, until something even close gets to Bitcoin's history, stability and liquidity the rest are a joke.   I say joke but I do love a lot of alts, but they don't come close to Bitcoin yet but the noobs still want their (insert cheap coin here) to become the next Bitcoin, good luck guys.   
I took a 5 second look at your post history and you sound like a bitter guy that feels left out :( Don't worry buddy, it's still early in the crypto game if you stop being wahhh about everything and feel like you're missing out.   Get into some good projects, don't FOMO in or out and enjoy the ride, stop hating on everything cuz you feel you missed the train. 
/u/cryptochecker
Lol good thing I have this black panther tied to me at all times. No one seems to try to fuck with me

https://i.imgur.com/T0u4np0.jpg 
I'm not going to get into a deep debate with you, but I will say not having to work to put food on your table and a roof over your head does not mean you can't keep busy and lead a fufilling life.

But if you personally can't, then by all means work.
I mean, dropping the cup.
I agree, there is substantially more selling pressure today.

I will be really looking forward to see how things hold up for BTC today an what level it sustains through the weekend.Could also indicate the usual weekend dip, that hasn't occurred for the past two weeks if I am not wrong.
Definitely not a moon boy.  BTC is just another tradeable commodity like any other financial instrument.  It's always better to follow the market than to constantly bet against it.

We retraced to 8618 and found significant front running support for 8.5k even though ETH dropped below 594 briefly.  This was a successful test.
$8600 got tested pretty good, so even if we bounce off of $9k, looks like that might hold, no? R/R on a short seems not that great IMO. 

But I would not mind just bouncing around the $8650-$8850 range for a bit to coil up a TAD. No moon necessary for now. 
Noob here... I'm bullish at the moment but don't understand the downvotes to your comment... we need to hear both sides people!!!
Have no clue and had been full fiat until a few hours ago. Went in with 25% of my all fiat position but am now regretting it. May just pull out at breakeven and keep waiting.

If the general public are still too burned to FOMO, I don't see where the new money to buy will come from.
[deleted]
google: “forward contract” before you lecture me
Yes, that’s why the 3rd word in my comment is “forward”
Alright, it's being said too much, fair enough. Some people still don't think it's being manipulated though, and this was the perfect time to point out that it's pretty obvious that it is occurring.
Bro, 1 doge will always be 1 doge. 
I don’t know what DNMS is, but Confidential Transactions work just ginr and they’re available on the Elements project
This is a good one.

So you can build something like this on lightning.

What you have is a secure binary that can compule something like BLAS to machine code and you run it on SGX with remote attestation.

You can then create Hash Time-locked contracts on Bitcoin in a lightning channel, where the hash-lock is replaced with some cryptogrphic scheme to recognize the remote attestation of the binary with the given input. You can use a witness commitment to bot have to store the entire input data, since you don’t care to persist the input data anyways

BTW, cgi rendering is generally massively parallelizable. So you just split the render up into smaller jobs and you create HTLCs in a lightning channel that allow any individual to claim the HtLC if they perform the render. The details of how to scurely exchange the rendered output with a signed transaction on the HTLC is a bit iffy, I would need more time.

Then, everyone just publishes their HTLCs on Lightning and any individual can pick up the inputs to perform the computation on their SGX and exchange the renderred output + attestation to claim the HTLC and get paid on Lightning for their CPU cycles.

You can of course replace SGX with GPUs and then you have to look into how to ensure consistency.


Apparently all the altkiddos are taking refuge in our sub because the quality of discourse is so terrible in the alt space. They will eventually get tired of our sub too when their chosen alt doesn't in fact overtake bitcoin.
nano is nothing new. The tech has been used by timestamp servers all over the world for nore than a decade. If you look into how BitTorrent works, you can see prallels to the broadcast protocol DAG basis for something like Nano. It will not scale to a globally distributed network without authenticated agreement, so it will not be decentralized imo
IOTA doesn't look superior to me, it looks different. It's a tradeoff of features just like ring sigs are. And it sets off alarm bells when altkiddos keep saying something is strictly superior to bitcoin. Also fuckin lol at Neo/DAG, you've gotten caught in the hype cycle.

You're right that something could dethrone bitcoin by being radically different. But I don't see that thing. You think we are just ignorant of alts, you can't comprehend that we've examined them and found them lacking. What I want is proof of work stored in a blockchain, with very limited opcodes to make formal verification easier. Bitcoin provides exactly that, exactly what is needed to be decentralized money.
lol

Real well-founded argument fonzy

where is your proof that iota can scale
> But they didn't brag about having a finished working product environment;

So you don't think they're overvalued not having a working product yet? Ideas are worth a 5 billion dollar market cap?
I’m sure big banks will make something cool
Actually, my horrible trades beg to differ.... 
Never deleted any posts must be the moderators with conflict interests from this sub.
[deleted]
Thank you
Yep, as a normie I learned the hard way. If it's obvious that it is a bear market just sell and look for a position that you are comfortable with. I dont try to time the market anymore but even I know when to run.
Ok well we will see I guess but if there was a 10x alt season right now it would be the first time in crypto history that bitcoin didn’t hit a new ath before the rest of the market went crazy. 
9200 is the level to watch I think, it was rejected and now question is if a second push comes or not
Bitfinex is a huge organisation. I truly don't think they would still be operating if it was a scam. Just because they haven't publicised their audits doesn't mean they haven't done any.  

Where is the proof of these fake audits?
[deleted]
Since when has logic stopped people from being greedy to the point of destroying their business?

WAX is a perfect example of this. The core idea behind their business was extremely solid and would have taken OPSkins to an entirely new level. However, instead of running the thing as an actual business, they threw out an ICO to cash-in from the get go. Well WAX cost lots of people (include kids) money and it ruined the chance for the operators to build a platform *significantly* larger than Steam.

I've seen it countless times, people too shortsighted to see the bigger and longer term game.
I think you misinterpreted my comment as being bearish, it's not. I'm not trying to trivialize the reversal from 6400 to 9000 and the break of the downtrend line, I am pretty bullish myself. My point is that even though we have gone up, we still have a lot of ground to reclaim between 9000-17000 and futures likely won't get a premium again until we reclaim and hold that ground, and new ATH looks likely.
Exactly. However you phrase it, the idea that coins are now worth more than 2 month futures and yet the market is rising is nuts. If you think the market is going up, then fûts > spot. If you don't then why the hell are you buying coins? 
Yes it did.
Nobody said its normies though. Money on the sidelines. Guys having their stack in usdt waiting to re-enter.
When did Bitcoin ever slowly creep up with no giant dildo's lol, it's always been volatile.  You had low to mid volume most the run before the blow off top before all the normies came in.   Just cuz it's not a blow off top doesn't mean it can't rise on low volume, I think you need to check the charts before Nov-Dec and remeber what it was like pre normies. 
I disagree. I don’t think things like partnerships with big companies or being used as a payment system in banks (ripple) should bring value to the coin in the long run. Why would it? Show me a model that depicts and calculates this, I haven’t seen one yet. Those coins aren’t stocks so we can’t treat them like that. And being widely used and accepted also doesn’t mean increase in value, quite the opposite actually. People give examples of highly valued companies like visa and paypal but those companies probably have internal ‘coins’ for moving the money internally and do you think those are worth much? No they aren’t. The stock of those companies is. And crypto isn’t a stock. 

The only value of the whole crypto sphere that I see right now is decentralized blockchain and a chance that a token of such blockchain will be used by big players to store value worldwide. And bitcoin right now is by far the best candidate for this. 
Yes Bitcoin is the flagship of crypto, there is no arguing in that and it has lots of mileage left in it. My issue is not with bitcoin, it is with the maximalism idealism, that they think everything started and ends with Bitcoin. Competition was never so intense in crypotoverse as it is right now. I don't think we'll have another Bitcoin, no single coin will ever be that dominant again in the future, bitcoin included.
This is a fascinating discussion. And where better could alt-lovers get proper responses than bitcoinmarkets ;)

I agree that the code for btc is tried and tested but it’s just not used for anything irl. Blockchain will rule in the future, but blockchain != bitcoin. 

Blockchain is not a magic cure for all IT needs, but in many areas it will prove itself incredibly useful. As this happens Btc will lose market dominance as people will want to invest in other blockchain based markets/offerings. All major exchanges are looking to make more fiat->alt pairs available. This then means millions of people won’t need to buy btc to buy the alt they want. 

I’m not coming here to fud, I own both btc and alts. I genuinely am interested in the discussion as to why you think btc will maintain such dominance. I have no doubt it will remain the dominant player. But the question is how dominant? Personally I think it will be quite a bit less than now. 
[deleted]
I'm not bitter dude, stating a fact. I have immense respect for BTC and bitcoin maximalism was one of the contributing factor to the growth of crypto, but idealism eventually results in stagnation. It's been always the case throughout history.

I actually started with BTC trading, but quickly got out of that mess and went into alts and got huge returns and potential. Currently very comfortable in my position and the bear market helped out a lot. Where I live, my national currency is depreciating every day so I enjoy this ride much more than you can possibly think.
God you're really full of shit. I'll leave you to your weird life; if you don't end up being shot for pissing off the wrong person one day I wish you luck with your 29 y/o retirement plan. But I guess you'll be too proud one day and lose everything: back to square one which will do good to you.

Nice dog though.
guns defeat dogs and people have been murdered over xbox rage quits.\

[edit] also if thats your dog, you just alerted people that you have a dog and will thus be prepared for such an encounter.

I’m sorry. 

Love you 
Gotcha... I think getting over $9200 will spirit any potential rally... below and it's still a bit of a swamp.  
Just did, care to lecture me how miners use forward contracts? They need to pay $X on utilities and the only thing they have is some hardware that will mine a block \(of value $Y depending on whatever the market is doing\) in the future.
Sorry I misread the comment. I had already mentioned that I thought miners used forwards not futures.

So your comment confused me.
If you don’t know what DNMs are, you are just a retarded noob to Bitcoin. Not wasting my time arguing with you. 
You're a born story teller ....
I've been in BTC since 2011, fortunately i don't have blinders on. 
Isnt the whole 'block-lattice' like an improved, efficient version of blockchain. I guess i need to look more into it.

Edit: didnt read the rest of your reply, definitely need to look more into it lol.
So something that's faster and has more widespread use\-ability doesn't look superior to you? Got it. PoW coins will fade. You don't ever provide a reason why DAG's/ NEO can't succeed. I'll tell you why bitcoin will fail. Too slow, ASIC fueled hash power oligopolies, and energy consumption.
Lmao what? Proof of concept has already happened. The tangle is scaling as predicted with more node set\-ups and volume. Not to mention you dodged everything else I said. Do you think Bitcoin scales at all? 
To be fair bitcoin can't yet do what it intends to do to a large-scale audience, yet it is valued the most out of all coins.
Can you blame the company for that? 
Whales, People, investor or whoever define the price. It's today's society fault..
Also there are many cases where companies needs investors to achieve their goals, I don't know why it would be different for a Crypto company.
If they do exit the market, take the money and never finish their products, that's different then but it's not the topic here.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Which of us have conflicts on interest? I'm listening.
In any case it's the only thing I use for actual trading also.  I like getting paid maker fees and the market fees are fair. 

Of course though I have to go elsewhere for a fiat interface. 
Crypto space keep evolving and Bitcoin is no where as dominant as it was, you would have to be naive if you think market will run like that. Ethereum leading this pump is a good example.
yeah I'm not sure if there will be. Now would be primo time to dump 
[deleted]
My point is that if people don't think tether would have enough money in their accounts to satisfy an audit; they're most likely wrong.
That wasn't my point.
If you think shit has to get back to 17k before futures will go positive, you clearly don't understand risk.

There have been numerous periods prior to this when shit looked bad and futures had a positive premium on upswings. Nobody is saying it has to be 5% positive but it's not even 0.1% ($8) positive. Rather it's -0.3% and that's the closest it's gotten since this rise started.

If you think it should be going up, you should be buying futures, not coins.
> Guys having their stack in usdt waiting to re-enter

Can you prove that? If it's all Tether, can you prove Tether wasn't simply printed by Bitfinex? We still haven't seen the audit and while /u/OnlyTheRealAdvice's theory from yesterday was a bit of a stretch, it's certainly possible and does fit the data we've seen so far in the market.

https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8dksw2/daily_discussion_friday_april_20_2018/dxp35rc/
> You had low to mid volume most the run before the blow off top before all the normies came in

Price would move up in a fashion much closer to this morning's small dip. Slow creep that would build up to faster and faster movements.

This is much more like a step function than a buildup of momentum. In between the whale jumps, there's less volatility than I've ever seen in bitcoin.
Not bringing value to the coin, but attracting investors to the coin by increasing its speculative value. I think that is pretty much obvious.

IMO we're on the verge of discovering a whole new asset class. We simply cannot compare crypto to our previous standards. Crypto is not stock, currency and store of value. But has some properties from all of them. Also blockchain technology is new, we recently got smart contracts and dapps, who knows what we will have on it in the future that will contribute to its value?
Bitcoin Maximalist checking in.

I think all almost other coins are shit because their code is garbage. I’m looking at you Iota
Of [u/GenghisKhanSpermShot](https://www.reddit.com/u/GenghisKhanSpermShot)'s last **133** posts and **1000** comments, I found **66** posts and **982** comments in cryptocurrency-related subreddits. Average sentiment (in the interval -1 to +1, with -1 **most negative** and +1 **most positive**) and karma counts are shown for each subreddit:

Subreddit|No. of posts|Avg. post sentiment|Total post karma|No. of comments|Avg. comment sentiment|Total comment karma
:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:--
r/NEO|1|0.17|2|0|0.0|0
r/decred|1|0.0|12|0|0.0|0
r/nem|2|-0.13|3|0|0.0|0
r/RaiBlocks|2|0.0|9|0|0.0|0
r/factom|8|0.1|146|2|0.02|4
r/vertcoin|1|0.0|3|0|0.0|0
r/ICONOMI|2|0.25|5|0|0.0|0
r/Bitcoin|16|0.12|1076|34|0.16|195
r/Lisk|1|0.0|2|0|0.0|0
r/BitcoinBeginners|2|-0.15|15|0|0.0|0
r/CryptoCurrency|14|0.1|248|42|0.09|468
r/BitcoinMarkets|4|0.1|13|898|0.12|3223
r/ArkEcosystem|7|0.33 **(quite positive)**|192|1|0.53 **(very positive)**|4
r/btc|0|0.0|0|4|0.34 **(quite positive)**|4
r/ethereum|1|0.0|1|0|0.0|0
r/reddCoin|0|0.0|0|1|0.11|1
r/gpumining|1|0.1|1|0|0.0|0
r/Iota|3|-0.12|15|0|0.0|0

***

^(Bleep, bloop, I'm a bot trying to help inform cryptocurrency discussion on Reddit.) ^| [^About](https://www.reddit.com/user/cryptochecker/comments/7q3jum/faq_about_ucryptochecker/) ^| [^Feedback](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=jamcowl&subject=cryptochecker%20bot) 
If that's the case I take it back and congrats on making your situation better. 
U know that episode of south park where gerald trolls people online but in person he is very pleasant and cordial? Well i’m gerald. But i'll stop trolling people regardless.
oh well, if I die, then I die. taking these coins with me to the afterlife and leaving them as vapor on the blockchain.
Rental and operational Costs are fixed. They can enter energy futures to hedge away their exposure to energy prices.

Then enter Forward contract to deliver X BTC at Y price on the first of the month. The counterparty (usually a utilities company) is obliged to purchase X BTC at Y price the first of every month, regardless where the market price is.

Miner locks in X*Y (>monthly mining costs) in fiat on the first of every month. Market price is irrelevant.
No, its my bad. I wanted to underline that a large miner would not use a futures contract. Futures are a standardized market-linked version of a forward basically and caters more to the retail-ish side of the market. Also, miners don’t need to have any counterparty risk, they can simply enter a contract with little to no margin, which makes the entire hedging practice far cheaper.

Also, forwards are completely free of charge (other than structuring fees if needed), while with futures you technically pay the spread 
Dark Net Marketplaces?

Why did you capitalize the S in the first place?
If you've been here since 2011 then this is the 3rd big alt wave you've seen. You should be expert at seeing through the hype by now.
block-lattice is a new structure, but you can do the same thing without a blockchain and it works fine.
you are so unbelievably terribly informed

I have a tangle node.

You people are just a waste of time because you dont know shit
Lol, what alt can do what it does on a large-scale or have been tested better and longer than Bitcoin that should make it more valuable than Bitcoin?
I'm no moderator.
Alright I guess this time it’s different ;)
How right you were... 
If it were that blatant, why haven't the authorities stepped in? Do you think you've caught onto something that no other countries government or legal system has?

God I'd love to be wrong. Another black-swan event like tether being a scam would probably give me a good shot at buying bitcoin under 3k.
[deleted]
+/- 1% or less is so little it's nearly negligible. It's not going to be more than that, and hasn't been more than that for at least two months. The biggest it got was like a $60 premium on the second pump to 11700. It's just going to oscillate around parity during the pumps and dumps while we range between 6000-20000. 

In order for a sustained premium we need the USD lending rate to go crazy on Finex and we need a premium on swaps. Neither of those things will happen unless we get close to 20k again and the mindset changes.

Edit: And I am long on futures btw, especially Sept. If you are a bull that is an interest free loan of 10x+for nearly 6 months...insane.


> Not bringing value to the coin, but attracting investors to the coin by increasing its speculative value. I think that is pretty much obvious.


My point is that it doesn’t attract actual investors but noobs who think this will give value to the coin. Serious investors use models to calculate expected returns and such and there are none (that I’ve seen) that show this in case of most coins. Saying “but banks will use it” doesn’t count because you need to actually see how banks using it will increase its value. If it was a company that created an algorithm that banks would use then sure the value of the company will probably increase, you can calculate this by seeing how much revenue they will get from banks etc etc. not with crypto. Holding ripple because ‘banks use it’ is the same as holding tons of paper used in printing dollars because ‘the treasury uses it’. 

Just look at the recent events, why did every single one of those alts lose 80+% of its value recently? Is it because those big partnerships broke down? Is it because banks decided not to use ripple? No it’s because it was a just a speculative circlejerk and there was no actual value in any of it. And as soon as it was clear that btc was in a bear market, every Alt collapsed. 

I can say the same thing about btc to be honest, currently, it doesn’t have any real value. What you want to do as an investor is find potential future value and I’ve said before where this value can appear in the crypto currency sphere (I mean coins). Sure any crypto current or future can become a global reserve currency, it’s just that it’s more probably to be btc. 

And yeah it’s stupid to say that things like big announcement don’t increase the price of alts - they do. But that’s why I said earlier that I don’t think they will be valuable in the *long run.* And also they do increase the value but the wrong reasons. 

My opinion. 
Hah, **especially** IOTA, worst fucking wallet I ever tried and I have tried a lot. 
Because they're trying to do more than just being a p2p currency. Bitcoin had 10 years to perfect itself, others are just starting in comparison. Things will not stay the same. With the amount of capital and talent pouring in crypto, this trend will not last. 2018 is just the beginning.
Filter out the zeros, it takes 2 figure movements to get pass you
Thank you man. Respect
Doesn't end well for him though, he's tracked down and locked ;) But maybe you have two sons that'll rescue you though
Do you think / know any big utility company / datacenters that will go into a contract with you to accept your bitcoin at some point in the future? If they do \(they don't\) they are the ones hedging out their their exposure using futures.

You can throw the bag to whoever you want, but that company/person most likely want to hedge out their exposure or they will be left holding it.

Not too sure but this lecture seems to suck so far..
Well forwards themselves technically have no spread but the counter party usually does get a discount against the open market, if he or she took the time to break up the contract into smaller sales.

However, the seller is usually more concerned with unloading a lot and isn't looking to worry about maximizing selling and/or taking on that work and risk.
You should realize everything around crypto is hype, especially BTC
Only reason it went to 20K, was hype...
I really don't know how you guys can act so childish. I like Bitcoin and I think it did a wonderful thing for paving the way in this space. But we should be real and objective about our approach. The fanaticism is so strange.
Ethereum? 

Btw some alts will never need as much use at bitcoin gets, they have different goals.

I never said they should be more valuable than bitcoin.

I understand this is a bitcoin trading sub but open your eyes a little. I still don't think bitcoin is the future, but I do think its value will increase hugely in the future, hence why I am here.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
I just really can't tell if this is the one going to $7.8k or simply $8.5-8.6k before $9.2-9.3k

That is, if we're going to follow the 2014 shit. Which we seem to have so far

I am sad I didn't short $9k :( 
[deleted]
Bitconnect was a clear ponzi scheme. The exit scam happened and they were at it again within two weeks.

Not a single law enforcement agency went after them despite tens of thousands if not hundreds of thousands getting scammed.
What do you have to say about the subpoena then?
Still waiting on your thoughts on the subpoena. Seems you don't have any?
You're right, it was in negative territory by 1-2% and that translated over to a massive financing cost on shorts for swaps. This entire run up, hasn't even produced a positive interest rate on swaps until just a couple hours ago. Normally I'd have seen at least 2-4% paid out by now. Not enough to even remotely cover any losses from the rise again a short but better than nothing.

Not even getting anything, just losing the rise. Then *if* it goes back down, you sure as shit will lose more on financing. That's not how it's suppose to work.

> The biggest it got was like a $60 premium on the second pump to 11700

No futures were ahead by almost 3%. Junes hit 12k when spot was 11,670 on March 5th. So I don't have a fucking clue what you're talking about.

> Neither of those things will happen unless we get close to 20k again and the mindset changes.

You are clearly an idiot, naive, and/or have no idea how risk works or how to look at past data on Bitmex (hint: change the timescale to 1 hr then scroll to the left to look at the previous prices).
Yes, I agree with your opinion in principles. This is a speculative market, no coin has any intrinsic value with our traditional standards, BTC included, and those that do (Tether, Digix etc) are pegged to something that has. I sometimes stick around r/buttcoin to give myself a dose of reality. 

But this market is still very raw and immature. We have way too many shitcoins and scamcoins. Brilliant minds are working on crypto, and if they can figure out a way towards adoption, we'll see real valuation. For now it's a speculative market and must be treated as such. I planned entry and exit points for my investment and I think every reasonable person should do the same.


Their client ri is also a joke
everyone always says talent is pouring into Crypto, but I beg to differ. Literally the shittiest of all developers are the crypto heads. The good developers write papers and work for Google. Look at Ethereum... only amateurs.

You probably don’t code and if you do, you’re probably not very good if you don’t see the farce

I dont get why you come to a Bitcoin trading sub to troll the alt maximalism, but you do you. I’ll trust my Master degrees while you get sold a lie

also, Bitcoin has been around for 9 years.
crap. I forgot about that part. Fuck. I gotta scrub my whole account now.
utilities companies and exchanges have been buying from miners since 2012-2013.

you vastly underestimate the risk tolerance of chinese utilities comp
I have plenty of nodes running

Im not a tribalist, I’m a realist
I hear you but I have my eyes open and watch all this.   Bancor and Crypto kitties was hardly stable, a lot of orphaned blocks, tied up transactions for hours on hours.   A ruling by the SEC on securities can wipe out ETH and all it's ICO's out in a second, I like ETH but no way would trust it as a sure thing long-term.   It has way more issues than Bitcoin at the moment. 
They already served tether a subpoena though so the government isn't oblivious to it.

I haven't been in this space long enough to know much about btc-e. When it was operating, did it have the level of notoriety that tether and bitfinex do now?
I truly don't understand the point you are trying to make. There is no "how it's supposed to work". If people aren't bullish, there won't be high funding costs to long swap and there won't be a futures premium, it doesn't matter if the price is in an uptrend. 


June may have hit 12k but at the time the March contract was still open, which was at a less than 1% premium, like I said about $60.


Can you explain what your point is? You are saying that futures should have a significant premium right now, correct? Why?
You're wrong on so many fronts that I simply don't know where to begin and frankly, don't see much point in it. I've had my share of battling confirmation bias and beliefs that contradict themselves when arguing with religious people to know when to give up. Good luck to you sir.
you better hope no one just took a screenshot or archive.is'd this conversation / your profile pages. 

also other sites like ceddit scrape deleted and moderated comments and show what was there before it was deleted. 
I'd love to believe that. Got any proof to back it up?
Is "I have a tangle node" supposed to back your claim in some way or criticize Iota? You claimed Iota had holes and problems. Simply stating that you have a node does not back up your claim. Thousands of people are running nodes to process an ever\-increasing volume of transactions. Confirmation rate is going up. Speed is going up. You have no valid claims against the tangle.
All coins will run into problems in the next few years. They're just growing pains and will separate the legit projects from the ones that don't have a place in society. 

I'm not shitting on bitcoin but there's no doubt other alts that have an equal right to exist and thrive, just as much as bitcoin does.
> June may have hit 12k but at the time the March contract was still open, which was at a less than 1% premium, like I said about $60.

They had 3 weeks before expiration. Junes currently have 10 weeks until expiration and are *still* negative.

Also 1% on a contract that's going to expire in 4 weeks is pretty freakin' big.

> Can you explain what your point is? You are saying that futures should have a significant premium right now, correct? Why?

Because futures are cheaper to buy than the coins themselves and therefore you should literally be buying futures, *not* coins. If you think it's going to go up and want to buy, then futures represent a better investment (not even factoring in the ability to use leverage, further lowering your risk profile).

Otherwise, you think it should go down and therefore should be *selling* your coins.

So the only way the futures can stay down but the price goes up is because coin holders refuse to exit crypto but don't believe in it enough to hold. That makes almost zero sense on a more practical basis.

The other possibility is market manipulation.
I am friends with most of the core devs and I know many people in the Ethereum, Monero and Cardano community, core devs and app builders alike.

I also know many people in academia and people who work for the big 4 tech companies with PhDs and published papers at SODA or PODC.

Also, I had a fuckton of shitcoins from the last 5 years. PIVX, Litecoin, Ethereum (was part of the crowd sale) and the like that I sold in January.

I make my own luck.

You, on the other hand, do not
alright well, this was good to learn regardless. Just gotta hope for the best and prepare for the worst now.
sadly no

my buddy mines Ethereum for free on Axpo premises in Switzerland. They get a cut of the mining reward every month and they offer their energy for free.

Energy is largely overproduced throughout the day, since you need to accomodate peak usage (some higher peaks are accomodated using secondary energy sources that convert potential energy into electricity)

So if you’re a Chinese utilities company that overproduces say by 20% during low usage, you can just offer that electricity to a miner for free basically. You only need to cover the peaks, which is generally cheaper than the value of the Bitcoins you’ve obtained
does that argument make sense?

this graph could help:

https://www.researchgate.net/figure/Energy-consumption-and-production-during-the-fi-rst-day-working-at-a-pressure-of-8-bars_fig5_270436801

Let miners use the energy delta in the valley and then the company can supply the peak through reservoirs
lol
You are completely disregarding counter party risk as well as hassles and risks that come with holding a contract instead of physical coin. Is a 0.3% discount worth having your coins on Bitmex, an unregulated exchange? Or what if liquidity disappears b/c of black swan news event and you don't have time to dump your futures long before it is liquidated? Or the pesky system overload?

The discount would have to be 5%+ at least before it makes sense for anyone other than traders to buy futures instead of actual coin. (And every time it does briefly drop to a couple percent, it is bought up)
Then you don't need to prove yourself to a noob like me. I may not be programmer but I've had my share of dealing with people to sense overcompensation. Please stop spamming my message box.
i would still routinely delete your comment history. like once a month or two because after a certain period, reddit wont let you delete comments (like 6 months i think). 

use firefox + greasemonkey and get the "nuke reddit history" script for greasemonkey. login to reddit and then let the script run on your profile page. it will replace every comment with some gibberish and then delete it afterward.

only really helps if someone hasnt already scraped your profile + taken screenshots etc. but its a good practice in general.

always prepare for the worst. stop blabbering about your gains.
So maybe the risk is being dispersed to Chinese citizens who pay for the state-subsidized electricity companies (assuming they in fact are subsidized). Rather than being forced to manage overproduction more carefully, they can afford to overproduce and crypto-mining provides them a further bonus. Correct?
> So if you’re a Chinese utilities company that overproduces say by 20% during low usage, you can just offer that electricity to a miner for free basically.

This is already happening in a lot of places in China. Note that getting electricity for free is not the same as having a forward contract. Also mining bitcoin requires more than electricity, you also need:

- mining hardware (you need to pay this upfront)
- server hardware (racks/fans/cooling/cables/controlling servers)
- rent for a warehouse/datacenter
- salary for staff
- etc. etc.

Either they can use forward contracts for the complete list above (I guess you can do this with salary in places without minimum wage) OR they risk not being able to pay these costs (I am just talking about market risk, not mining risk) OR they simply hedge out using futures.
But traders should be arbing it out. *They're not* and that's the point. Free money is being left on the table and nobody's taking it.
for sure man. thanks for that resource. i'll keep myself invisible from here forth. 

Much gratitude for keeping me grounded in reality, you are right, if someone really wants me if they have enough willpower then they can get me.
No. The utility company overproduces energy. That energy would basically be lost unless they used it otherwise. There are marginal costs involved, nothing compared to the profitability of getting a piece of the mining action
It kind of is tho, right now there's a $10 difference between swaps and  the contracts and Bfx spot. Funding is minimum, everything is at parity and hardly deviates by a couple tenths of a percent.

In order for it to get distorted in either direction like it was we need the FOMO and hopes of a new ATH, which would happen if we go sideways/up for weeks and retrace back to 15-17k (like I said in my original post). It could also happen sooner but we haven't had enough pumpage for that.
Just to make it clear, it took 3 *years* for the market to get back to the ATH from the last bubble burst.

Now you're expecting it to get back to the last ATH in under 6 months? Could you please give us the key to this fantasy world so we can all go live there too?
When did I ever say that? I didn't make any price predictions...all I'm saying is there probably won't be a premium until we get a new ATH or get close to the old ATH.

Edit: If you are referring to this:

>if we go sideways/up for weeks and retrace back to 15-17k

I'm not saying that's what is going to happen or what I expect. I'm listing that as a condition that could bring back the premium. Obviously if we stay bearish then the premium will not come back at all.

> all I'm saying is there probably won't be a premium until we get a new ATH or get close to the old ATH.

Again that makes literally zero sense. It gives no cost to borrowing and/or using leverage to long. Risk free borrowing violates the theory of an efficient market.
Dude. Funding right now is fucking dirt cheap. Under .01% per day on finex for weeks, 0.01% on mex or even negative at times. If funding stays cheap, there will not be a premium on futures. Funding will stay cheap until we are once again clearly in a bull market.

If we stay sideways/down for another 3 years like last time, futures will probably develop a permanent discount of maybe 1 or 2 percent.

Yes, I understand that since futures expire in the future the default should be a premium that you pay instead of interest on a loan. However, if getting that loan is dirt cheap (as it is now) then that premium will be small/nothing, and if sentiment is bearish on top of that, then it will be nothing/discount (as it's been).
